Indiana, session 2026, SB81.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-1-14-17, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]: Sec. 17. (a) This section applies to a qualified political
subdivision.
(b) As used this section, "general obligation bond" means a bond
issued for a short term period of not more than five (5) years and
payable from property taxes for a purpose or project that is not a
controlled project (as defined in IC 6-1.1-20-1.1) for which the bond is
not required to be issued using the procedures in IC 6-1.1-20.
(c) As used in this section, "qualified political subdivision" means
a county, city, town, township, or school corporation.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in
subsection (e), if a qualified political subdivision issues new general
obligation bonds, or has issued general obligation bonds before May 1,
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


2025, for a period of two (2) years of or less, then at the expiration of
those general obligation bonds, the qualified political subdivision must
wait one (1) year from that date before the qualified political
subdivision may issue general obligation bonds. This subsection
applies only to short-term general obligation bonds for two (2)
years or less, it does not apply to general obligation bonds issued
after April 31, 2025.
(e) Subsection (d) shall not apply to a qualified political subdivision
in the case of a natural disaster, an accident, or another unanticipated
emergency as determined by the department of local government
finance.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-2-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, "tax increment
financing allocation area" means any area authorized by statute in
which ad valorem property taxes are allocated, including the following:
(1) IC 6-1.1-39 (economic development districts).
(2) IC 8-22-3.5 (airport development zones).
(3) IC 36-7-14 (redevelopment of areas needing redevelopment
generally).
(4) IC 36-7-15.1 (redevelopment of areas in Marion County).
(5) IC 36-7-30 (reuse of federal military bases).
(6) IC 36-7-30.5 (development of multicounty federal military
bases).
(7) IC 36-7-32 (certified technology parks).
(8) IC 36-7-32.5 (innovation development districts).
(9) IC 36-7.5-4.5 (rail transit development districts).
(b) The department shall, in each year beginning after December 31,
2025, and ending before January 1, 2034, adjust the base assessed
value of each tax increment financing allocation area to neutralize the
effect of the changing tax rates resulting year to year from the
homestead deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37(c)(2) and
IC 6-1.1-12-37.5(c) and the deduction for eligible property under
IC 6-1.1-12-47. statutory provisions enacted in P.L.68-2025, under
IC 6-1.1-12 (property tax deductions), IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.7
(supplemental homestead credit), IC 6-1.1-51.3 (local property tax
credits), and IC 6-1.1-3-7.2 (business personal property tax
exemption). It is the intent of the general assembly that an increase in
revenue from a change in tax rates resulting from these statutes those
statutory provisions enacted in P.L.68-2025 accrue only to the base
assessed value and not to the tax increment financing allocation area.
(c) However, the adjustment under subsection (b) may not
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


impair any obligation or rights with respect to any creditor or
bondholder to which taxes from a tax increment financing
allocation area have been pledged.
(d) In the case of a decrease in revenue from a change in tax rates
resulting from these statutes, the provisions enacted in P.L.68-2025,
as described in subsection (b), the department may neutralize the
change under this subsection in a positive manner with regard to the
tax increment financing allocation area to protect the ability to pay
bonds based on incremental revenue, if the tax increment financing
allocation area demonstrates to the department that an adjustment is
needed before the department calculates a positive neutralization
adjustment.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-10-57 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 57. (a) This section applies to assessment
dates occurring after December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "eligible property" means the real
property, mobile home not assessed as real property, or
manufactured home not assessed as real property that a
permanently disabled veteran owns (or the real property, mobile
home not assessed as real property, or manufactured home not
assessed as real property that the individual is buying under a
contract that provides that the individual is to pay property taxes
on the real property, mobile home, or manufactured home if the
contract or a memorandum of the contract is recorded in the
county recorder's office).
(c) As used in this section, "permanently disabled veteran"
means an individual who:
(1) served in the military or naval forces of the United States
during any of its wars;
(2) received an honorable discharge;
(3) has a service connected disability that is debilitating and
permanent; and
(4) has a disability evidenced by:
(A) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a
disability compensation check issued by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(B) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive an
exemption under this section.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(d) Eligible property owned by a permanently disabled veteran
is exempt from property taxation in an amount equal to:
(1) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of ten percent (10%), ten percent
(10%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(2) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of twenty percent (20%), twenty
percent (20%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(3) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of thirty percent (30%), thirty
percent (30%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(4) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of forty percent (40%), forty
percent (40%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(5) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of fifty percent (50%), fifty
percent (50%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(6) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of sixty percent (60%), sixty
percent (60%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(7) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of seventy percent (70%), seventy
percent (70%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(8) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of eighty percent (80%), eighty
percent (80%) of the eligible property's assessed value;
(9) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of ninety percent (90%), ninety
percent (90%) of the eligible property's assessed value; and
(10) in the case of a permanently disabled veteran with a
service connected disability of one hundred percent (100%),
one hundred percent (100%) of the eligible property's
assessed value.
(e) A permanently disabled veteran must apply to the county
auditor for the exemption under this section. The county auditor
shall apply the exemption for the assessment date and for the
assessment date in each later year that the permanently disabled
veteran owns the eligible property.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-12-37, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 37. (a) The following
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Dwelling" means any of the following:
(A) Residential real property improvements that an individual
uses as the individual's residence, limited to a single house and
a single garage, regardless of whether the single garage is
attached to the single house or detached from the single house.
(B) A mobile home that is not assessed as real property that an
individual uses as the individual's residence.
(C) A manufactured home that is not assessed as real property
that an individual uses as the individual's residence.
(2) "Homestead" means an individual's principal place of
residence:
(A) that is located in Indiana;
(B) that:
(i) the individual owns;
(ii) the individual is buying under a contract recorded in the
county recorder's office, or evidenced by a memorandum of
contract recorded in the county recorder's office under
IC 36-2-11-20, that provides that the individual is to pay the
property taxes on the residence, and that obligates the owner
to convey title to the individual upon completion of all of the
individual's contract obligations;
(iii) the individual is entitled to occupy as a
tenant-stockholder (as defined in 26 U.S.C. 216) of a
cooperative housing corporation (as defined in 26 U.S.C.
216); or
(iv) is a residence described in section 17.9 of this chapter
(before its expiration) that is owned by a trust if the
individual is an individual described in section 17.9 of this
chapter; (before its expiration); and
(C) that consists of a dwelling and includes up to one (1) acre
of land immediately surrounding that dwelling, and any of the
following improvements:
(i) Any number of decks, patios, gazebos, or pools.
(ii) One (1) additional building that is not part of the
dwelling if the building is predominantly used for a
residential purpose and is not used as an investment property
or as a rental property.
(iii) One (1) additional residential yard structure other than
a deck, patio, gazebo, or pool.
Except as provided in subsection (r), the term does not include
property owned by a corporation, partnership, limited liability
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


company, or other entity not described in this subdivision.
(b) Each year a homestead is eligible for a standard deduction from
the assessed value of the homestead for an assessment date. Except as
provided in subsection (n), the deduction provided by this section
applies to property taxes first due and payable for an assessment date
only if an individual has an interest in the homestead described in
subsection (a)(2)(B) on:
(1) the assessment date; or
(2) any date in the same year after an assessment date that a
statement is filed under subsection (e) or section 44 of this
chapter, if the property consists of real property.
If more than one (1) individual or entity qualifies property as a
homestead under subsection (a)(2)(B) for an assessment date, only one
(1) standard deduction from the assessed value of the homestead may
be applied for the assessment date. Subject to subsection (c), the
auditor of the county shall record and make the deduction for the
individual or entity qualifying for the deduction.
(c) Except as provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, the total
amount of the deduction that a person may receive under this section
for a particular year is:
(1) for assessment dates before January 1, 2025, the lesser of:
(A) sixty percent (60%) of the assessed value of the real
property, mobile home not assessed as real property, or
manufactured home not assessed as real property; or
(B) forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000); or
(2) for assessment dates after December 31, 2024:
(A) in 2025, forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000);
(B) in 2026, in the case of a homestead with an assessed
value of more than one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000), forty thousand dollars ($40,000);
(C) in 2027, in the case of a homestead with an assessed
value of more than one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000), thirty thousand dollars ($30,000);
(D) in 2028, in the case of a homestead with an assessed
value of more than one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000), twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); and
(E) in 2029, in the case of a homestead with an assessed
value of more than one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000), ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and
(3) for assessment dates after December 31, 2025, in the case
of a homestead with an assessed value of one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) or less, the sum of:
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(A) sixty percent (60%) of the assessed value of the real
property, mobile home not assessed as real property, or
manufactured home not assessed as real property; or
(B) forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000).
Beginning with the 2030 assessment date, and each assessment date
thereafter, the deduction amount under this section, in the case of a
homestead with an assessed value of more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000), is zero (0). Application of
the phase down under this section for assessment dates after December
31, 2024, with regard to mobile homes that are not assessed as real
property and manufactured homes not assessed as real property shall
be construed and applied in the same manner in terms of timing and
consistent with its application for real property.
(d) A person who has sold real property, a mobile home not assessed
as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real property
to another person under a contract that provides that the contract buyer
is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided under this
section with respect to that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(e) Except as provided in sections 17.8 and 44 of this chapter and
subject to section 45 of this chapter, an individual who desires to claim
the deduction provided by this section must file a certified statement on
forms prescribed by the department of local government finance with
the auditor of the county in which the homestead is located. The
statement must include:
(1) the parcel number or key number of the property and the name
of the city, town, or township in which the property is located;
(2) the name of any other location in which the applicant or the
applicant's spouse owns, is buying, or has a beneficial interest in
residential real property;
(3) the names of:
(A) the applicant and the applicant's spouse (if any):
(i) as the names appear in the records of the United States
Social Security Administration for the purposes of the
issuance of a Social Security card and Social Security
number; or
(ii) that they use as their legal names when they sign their
names on legal documents;
if the applicant is an individual; or
(B) each individual who qualifies property as a homestead
under subsection (a)(2)(B) and the individual's spouse (if any):
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(i) as the names appear in the records of the United States
Social Security Administration for the purposes of the
issuance of a Social Security card and Social Security
number; or
(ii) that they use as their legal names when they sign their
names on legal documents;
if the applicant is not an individual; and
(4) either:
(A) the last five (5) digits of the applicant's Social Security
number and the last five (5) digits of the Social Security
number of the applicant's spouse (if any); or
(B) if the applicant or the applicant's spouse (if any) does not
have a Social Security number, any of the following for that
individual:
(i) The last five (5) digits of the individual's driver's license
number.
(ii) The last five (5) digits of the individual's state
identification card number.
(iii) The last five (5) digits of a preparer tax identification
number that is obtained by the individual through the
Internal Revenue Service of the United States.
(iv) If the individual does not have a driver's license, a state
identification card, or an Internal Revenue Service preparer
tax identification number, the last five (5) digits of a control
number that is on a document issued to the individual by the
United States government.
If a form or statement provided to the county auditor under this section,
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1, or IC 6-1.1-22.5-12 includes the telephone number or
part or all of the Social Security number of a party or other number
described in subdivision (4)(B) of a party, the telephone number and
the Social Security number or other number described in subdivision
(4)(B) included are confidential. The statement may be filed in person
or by mail. If the statement is mailed, the mailing must be postmarked
on or before the last day for filing. The statement applies for that first
year and any succeeding year for which the deduction is allowed.
(f) To obtain the deduction for a desired calendar year under this
section in which property taxes are first due and payable, the individual
desiring to claim the deduction must do the following as applicable:
(1) Complete, date, and file the certified statement described in
subsection (e) on or before January 15 of the calendar year in
which the property taxes are first due and payable.
(2) Satisfy any recording requirements on or before January 15 of
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


the calendar year in which the property taxes are first due and
payable for a homestead described in subsection (a)(2).
(g) Except as provided in subsection (l), if a person who is
receiving, or seeks to receive, the deduction provided by this section in
the person's name:
(1) changes the use of the individual's property so that part or all
of the property no longer qualifies for the deduction under this
section; or
(2) is not eligible for a deduction under this section because the
person is already receiving:
(A) a deduction under this section in the person's name as an
individual or a spouse; or
(B) a deduction under the law of another state that is
equivalent to the deduction provided by this section;
the person must file a certified statement with the auditor of the county,
notifying the auditor of the person's ineligibility, not more than sixty
(60) days after the date of the change in eligibility. A person who fails
to file the statement required by this subsection may, under
IC 6-1.1-36-17, be liable for any additional taxes that would have been
due on the property if the person had filed the statement as required by
this subsection plus a civil penalty equal to ten percent (10%) of the
additional taxes due. The civil penalty imposed under this subsection
is in addition to any interest and penalties for a delinquent payment that
might otherwise be due. One percent (1%) of the total civil penalty
collected under this subsection shall be transferred by the county to the
department of local government finance for use by the department in
establishing and maintaining the homestead property data base under
subsection (j) and, to the extent there is money remaining, for any other
purposes of the department. This amount becomes part of the property
tax liability for purposes of this article.
(h) The department of local government finance may adopt rules or
guidelines concerning the application for a deduction under this
section.
(i) This subsection does not apply to property in the first year for
which a deduction is claimed under this section if the sole reason that
a deduction is claimed on other property is that the individual or
married couple maintained a principal residence at the other property
on the assessment date in the same year in which an application for a
deduction is filed under this section or, if the application is for a
homestead that is assessed as personal property, on the assessment date
in the immediately preceding year and the individual or married couple
is moving the individual's or married couple's principal residence to the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


property that is the subject of the application. Except as provided in
subsection (l), the county auditor may not grant an individual or a
married couple a deduction under this section if:
(1) the individual or married couple, for the same year, claims the
deduction on two (2) or more different applications for the
deduction; and
(2) the applications claim the deduction for different property.
(j) The department of local government finance shall provide secure
access to county auditors to a homestead property data base that
includes access to the homestead owner's name and the numbers
required from the homestead owner under subsection (e)(4) for the sole
purpose of verifying whether an owner is wrongly claiming a deduction
under this chapter or a credit under IC 6-1.1-20.4, IC 6-1.1-20.6, or
IC 6-3.6-5 (before its expiration). Each county auditor shall submit data
on deductions applicable to the current tax year on or before March 15
of each year in a manner prescribed by the department of local
government finance.
(k) A county auditor may require an individual to provide evidence
proving that the individual's residence is the individual's principal place
of residence as claimed in the certified statement filed under subsection
(e). The county auditor may limit the evidence that an individual is
required to submit to a state income tax return, a valid driver's license,
or a valid voter registration card showing that the residence for which
the deduction is claimed is the individual's principal place of residence.
The county auditor may not deny an application filed under section 44
of this chapter because the applicant does not have a valid driver's
license or state identification card with the address of the homestead
property. The department of local government finance shall work with
county auditors to develop procedures to determine whether a property
owner that is claiming a standard deduction or homestead credit is not
eligible for the standard deduction or homestead credit because the
property owner's principal place of residence is outside Indiana.
(l) A county auditor shall grant an individual a deduction under this
section regardless of whether the individual and the individual's spouse
claim a deduction on two (2) different applications and each
application claims a deduction for different property if the property
owned by the individual's spouse is located outside Indiana and the
individual files an affidavit with the county auditor containing the
following information:
(1) The names of the county and state in which the individual's
spouse claims a deduction substantially similar to the deduction
allowed by this section.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(2) A statement made under penalty of perjury that the following
are true:
(A) That the individual and the individual's spouse maintain
separate principal places of residence.
(B) That neither the individual nor the individual's spouse has
an ownership interest in the other's principal place of
residence.
(C) That neither the individual nor the individual's spouse has,
for that same year, claimed a standard or substantially similar
deduction for any property other than the property maintained
as a principal place of residence by the respective individuals.
A county auditor may require an individual or an individual's spouse to
provide evidence of the accuracy of the information contained in an
affidavit submitted under this subsection. The evidence required of the
individual or the individual's spouse may include state income tax
returns, excise tax payment information, property tax payment
information, driver's license information, and voter registration
information.
(m) If:
(1) a property owner files a statement under subsection (e) to
claim the deduction provided by this section for a particular
property; and
(2) the county auditor receiving the filed statement determines
that the property owner's property is not eligible for the deduction;
the county auditor shall inform the property owner of the county
auditor's determination in writing. If a property owner's property is not
eligible for the deduction because the county auditor has determined
that the property is not the property owner's principal place of
residence, the property owner may appeal the county auditor's
determination as provided in IC 6-1.1-15. The county auditor shall
inform the property owner of the owner's right to appeal when the
county auditor informs the property owner of the county auditor's
determination under this subsection.
(n) An individual is entitled to the deduction under this section for
a homestead for a particular assessment date if:
(1) either:
(A) the individual's interest in the homestead as described in
subsection (a)(2)(B) is conveyed to the individual after the
assessment date, but within the calendar year in which the
assessment date occurs; or
(B) the individual contracts to purchase the homestead after
the assessment date, but within the calendar year in which the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


assessment date occurs;
(2) on the assessment date:
(A) the property on which the homestead is currently located
was vacant land; or
(B) the construction of the dwelling that constitutes the
homestead was not completed; and
(3) either:
(A) the individual files the certified statement required by
subsection (e); or
(B) a sales disclosure form that meets the requirements of
section 44 of this chapter is submitted to the county assessor
on or before December 31 of the calendar year for the
individual's purchase of the homestead.
An individual who satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (1)
through (3) is entitled to the deduction under this section for the
homestead for the assessment date, even if on the assessment date the
property on which the homestead is currently located was vacant land
or the construction of the dwelling that constitutes the homestead was
not completed. The county auditor shall apply the deduction for the
assessment date and for the assessment date in any later year in which
the homestead remains eligible for the deduction. A homestead that
qualifies for the deduction under this section as provided in this
subsection is considered a homestead for purposes of section 37.5 of
this chapter and IC 6-1.1-20.6.
(o) This subsection applies to an application for the deduction
provided by this section that is filed for an assessment date occurring
after December 31, 2013. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, an individual buying a mobile home that is not assessed as real
property or a manufactured home that is not assessed as real property
under a contract providing that the individual is to pay the property
taxes on the mobile home or manufactured home is not entitled to the
deduction provided by this section unless the parties to the contract
comply with IC 9-17-6-17.
(p) This subsection:
(1) applies to an application for the deduction provided by this
section that is filed for an assessment date occurring after
December 31, 2013; and
(2) does not apply to an individual described in subsection (o).
The owner of a mobile home that is not assessed as real property or a
manufactured home that is not assessed as real property must attach a
copy of the owner's title to the mobile home or manufactured home to
the application for the deduction provided by this section.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(q) For assessment dates after 2013, the term "homestead" includes
property that is owned by an individual who:
(1) is serving on active duty in any branch of the armed forces of
the United States;
(2) was ordered to transfer to a location outside Indiana; and
(3) was otherwise eligible, without regard to this subsection, for
the deduction under this section for the property for the
assessment date immediately preceding the transfer date specified
in the order described in subdivision (2).
For property to qualify under this subsection for the deduction provided
by this section, the individual described in subdivisions (1) through (3)
must submit to the county auditor a copy of the individual's transfer
orders or other information sufficient to show that the individual was
ordered to transfer to a location outside Indiana. The property continues
to qualify for the deduction provided by this section until the individual
ceases to be on active duty, the property is sold, or the individual's
ownership interest is otherwise terminated, whichever occurs first.
Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2), the property remains a homestead
regardless of whether the property continues to be the individual's
principal place of residence after the individual transfers to a location
outside Indiana. The property continues to qualify as a homestead
under this subsection if the property is leased while the individual is
away from Indiana and is serving on active duty, if the individual has
lived at the property at any time during the past ten (10) years.
Otherwise, the property ceases to qualify as a homestead under this
subsection if the property is leased while the individual is away from
Indiana. Property that qualifies as a homestead under this subsection
shall also be construed as a homestead for purposes of section 37.5 of
this chapter.
(r) As used in this section, "homestead" includes property that
satisfies each of the following requirements:
(1) The property is located in Indiana and consists of a dwelling
and includes up to one (1) acre of land immediately surrounding
that dwelling, and any of the following improvements:
(A) Any number of decks, patios, gazebos, or pools.
(B) One (1) additional building that is not part of the dwelling
if the building is predominately used for a residential purpose
and is not used as an investment property or as a rental
property.
(C) One (1) additional residential yard structure other than a
deck, patio, gazebo, or pool.
(2) The property is the principal place of residence of an
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


individual.
(3) The property is owned by an entity that is not described in
subsection (a)(2)(B).
(4) The individual residing on the property is a shareholder,
partner, or member of the entity that owns the property.
(5) The property was eligible for the standard deduction under
this section on March 1, 2009.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-17-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The proper officers of a political
subdivision shall formulate its estimated budget and its proposed tax
rate and tax levy on the form prescribed by the department of local
government finance and approved by the state board of accounts. In
formulating a political subdivision's estimated budget under this
section, the proper officers of the political subdivision must consider
the net property tax revenue that will be collected by the political
subdivision during the ensuing year, after taking into account the
estimate by the department of local government finance under
IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1 of the amount by which the political subdivision's
distribution of property taxes will be reduced by credits under
IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.5 in the ensuing year, after taking into account the
estimate by the department of local government finance under section
0.7 of this chapter of the maximum amount of net property tax revenue
and miscellaneous revenue that the political subdivision will receive in
the ensuing year, and after taking into account all payments for debt
service obligations that are to be made by the political subdivision
during the ensuing year. The political subdivision or appropriate fiscal
body, if the political subdivision is subject to section 20 of this chapter,
shall submit the following information to the department's computer
gateway:
(1) The estimated budget.
(2) The estimated maximum permissible levy, as provided by the
department under IC 6-1.1-18.5-24.
(3) The current and proposed tax levies of each fund.
(4) The percentage change between the current and proposed tax
levies of each fund.
(5) The amount by which the political subdivision's distribution
of property taxes may be reduced by credits granted under
IC 6-1.1-20.6, as estimated by the department of local government
finance under IC 6-1.1-20.6-11.1.
(6) The amounts of excessive levy appeals to be requested.
(7) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


appropriate fiscal body will hold a public hearing on the items
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(8) The amount of any increase in the tax rate and tax levies of the
political subdivision in an ordinance adopted under section 23 of
this chapter.
(9) (8) The time and place at which the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body will meet to fix the budget, tax rate, and
levy under section 5 of this chapter.
(10) (9) The date, time, and place of the final adoption of the
budget, tax rate, and levy under section 5 of this chapter.
Except as provided in section 5.6(b) of this chapter, the political
subdivision or appropriate fiscal body shall submit this information to
the department's computer gateway at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by this subsection in the manner prescribed by
the department. If the date, time, or place of the final adoption
subsequently changes, the political subdivision shall update the
information submitted to the department's computer gateway. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers, at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing, through its computer gateway
and provide a telephone number through which taxpayers may request
mailed copies of a political subdivision's information under this
subsection. The department's computer gateway must allow a taxpayer
to search for the information under this subsection by the taxpayer's
address. The department shall review only the submission to the
department's computer gateway for compliance with this section.
(b) The board of directors of a solid waste management district
established under IC 13-21 or IC 13-9.5-2 (before its repeal) may
conduct the public hearing required under subsection (a):
(1) in any county of the solid waste management district; and
(2) in accordance with the annual notice of meetings published
under IC 13-21-5-2.
(c) The trustee of each township in the county shall estimate the
amount necessary to meet the cost of township assistance in the
township for the ensuing calendar year. The township board shall
subject to section 23 of this chapter, adopt with the township budget a
tax rate sufficient to meet the estimated cost of township assistance.
The taxes collected as a result of the tax rate adopted under this
subsection are credited to the township assistance fund.
(d) A political subdivision for which any of the information under
subsection (a) is not submitted to the department's computer gateway
in the manner prescribed by the department shall have its most recent
annual appropriations and annual tax levy continued for the ensuing
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


budget year.
(e) If a political subdivision or appropriate fiscal body timely
submits the information under subsection (a) but subsequently
discovers the information contains an error, the political subdivision or
appropriate fiscal body may submit amended information to the
department's computer gateway. However, submission of an
amendment to information described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(7)
must occur at least ten (10) days before the public hearing held under
subsection (a), and submission of an amendment to information
described in subsection (a)(8) through (a)(9) must occur at least
twenty-four (24) hours before the time in which the meeting to fix the
budget, tax rate, and levy was originally advertised to commence.
(f) Each year, the governing body of a school corporation that
imposes property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals on
a lease for a controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20, property taxes under
an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1, or property taxes
under a school safety referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-9, shall
submit the following information at least ten (10) days before the
public hearing required by subsection (a) in the manner prescribed by
the department:
(1) the purposes specified in the public question submitted to the
voters or any revenue spending plans adopted under
IC 6-1.1-20-13, IC 20-46-1-8, or IC 20-46-9-6 for:
(A) debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a
controlled project under IC 6-1.1-20;
(B) an operating referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-1; or
(C) a school safety referendum tax levy approved by the voters
of the school corporation under IC 20-46-9;
as applicable; and
(2) the debt service levy fund, operating referendum tax levy
fund, or school safety referendum tax levy fund of the school
corporation, whichever is applicable;
to show whether the school corporation is using revenue collected from
the referendum tax levy in the amounts and for the purposes
established in the purposes specified in the public question submitted
to the voters or the revenue spending plan, as applicable. The
department shall make this information available to taxpayers at least
ten (10) days before the public hearing.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-17-3.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.2. (a) This section applies to
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


an operating referendum tax levy under IC 20-46-1 approved by
the voters after December 31, 2025, that is imposed by a school
corporation for taxes first due and payable after December 31,
2026.
(b) Notwithstanding any increase in the assessed value of
property from the previous assessment date, for each year
following the first calendar year in which taxes are first due and
payable for an operating referendum, or renewal of an existing
operating referendum, under IC 20-46-1, the total amount of
operating referendum tax that may be levied by a school
corporation may not exceed the lesser of:
(1) the school corporation's maximum operating referendum
tax levy in the immediately preceding year; multiplied by
(2) the maximum levy growth quotient under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
The tax rate for an operating referendum tax levy shall be
decreased, if necessary, to comply with this limitation.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-17-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 16. (a) The department of local government
finance shall certify the tax rates and tax levies for all funds of political
subdivisions subject to the department of local government finance's
review.
(b) For a fund of a political subdivision subject to levy limits under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-3, the department of local government finance shall
calculate and certify the allowable budget of the fund if the political
subdivision adopts a tax levy that exceeds the estimated maximum levy
limits as provided by the department of local government finance under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-24.
(c) For a fund of a political subdivision subject to levy limits under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-3 and for which the political subdivision adopts a tax
levy that is not more than the levy limits under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3, the
department of local government finance shall review the fund to ensure
the adopted budget is fundable based on the unit's adopted tax levy and
estimates of available revenues. If the adopted budget is fundable, the
department of local government finance shall use the adopted budget
as the approved appropriation for the fund for the budget year. As
needed, the political subdivision may complete the additional
appropriation process through IC 6-1.1-18-5 for these funds during the
budget year.
(d) For a fund of the political subdivision subject to levy limits
under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3 and for which the political subdivision adopts a
tax levy that is not more than the levy limits under IC 6-1.1-18.5-3, if
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


the department of local government finance has determined the adopted
budget is not fundable based on the unit's adopted tax levy and
estimates of available revenues, the department of local government
finance shall calculate and certify the allowable budget that is fundable
based on the adopted tax levy and the department's estimates of
available revenues.
(e) For all other funds of a political subdivision not described in
subsections (b), (c), and (d), the department of local government
finance shall certify a budget for the fund.
(f) Except as provided in section 16.1 of this chapter, the department
of local government finance is not required to hold a public hearing
before the department of local government finance reviews, revises,
reduces, or increases a political subdivision's budget by fund, tax rate,
or tax levy under this section.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (l), IC 20-46, or IC 6-1.1-18.5,
the department of local government finance may not increase a political
subdivision's budget by fund, tax rate, or tax levy to an amount which
exceeds the amount originally fixed by the political subdivision.
However, if the department of local government finance determines
that IC 5-3-1-2.3(b) applies to the tax rate, tax levy, or budget of the
political subdivision, the maximum amount by which the department
may increase the tax rate, tax levy, or budget is the amount originally
fixed by the political subdivision, and not the amount that was
incorrectly published or omitted in the notice described in
IC 5-3-1-2.3(b). The department of local government finance shall give
the political subdivision notification electronically in the manner
prescribed by the department of local government finance specifying
any revision, reduction, or increase the department proposes in a
political subdivision's tax levy or tax rate. The political subdivision has
ten (10) calendar days from the date the political subdivision receives
the notice to provide a response electronically in the manner prescribed
by the department of local government finance. The response may
include budget reductions, reallocation of levies, a revision in the
amount of miscellaneous revenues, and further review of any other
item about which, in the view of the political subdivision, the
department is in error. The department of local government finance
shall consider the adjustments as specified in the political subdivision's
response if the response is provided as required by this subsection and
shall deliver a final decision to the political subdivision. The
department of local government finance may not consider any
adjustments that are suggested by the political subdivision after the
expiration of the ten (10) day period allowed for the political
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


subdivision's response.
(h) The department of local government finance may not approve a
levy for lease payments by a city, town, county, library, or school
corporation if the lease payments are payable to a building corporation
for use by the building corporation for debt service on bonds and if:
(1) no bonds of the building corporation are outstanding; or
(2) the building corporation has enough legally available funds on
hand to redeem all outstanding bonds payable from the particular
lease rental levy requested.
(i) The department of local government finance shall certify its
action to:
(1) the county auditor;
(2) if the budget and levy of the political subdivision are being
continued:
(A) the state board of accounts;
(B) the state comptroller; and
(C) the department of state revenue;
(3) the political subdivision if the department acts pursuant to an
appeal initiated by the political subdivision; and
(4) a taxpayer that owns property that represents at least ten
percent (10%) of the taxable assessed valuation in the political
subdivision.
(j) The following may petition for judicial review of the final
determination of the department of local government finance under
subsection (i):
(1) If the department acts under an appeal initiated by a political
subdivision, the political subdivision.
(2) A taxpayer that owns property that represents at least ten
percent (10%) of the taxable assessed valuation in the political
subdivision.
The petition must be filed in the tax court not more than forty-five (45)
days after the department certifies its action under subsection (i).
(k) The department of local government finance is expressly
directed to complete the duties assigned to it under this section as
follows:
(1) Not later than December 31 of the year preceding that budget
year, unless subdivision (2) applies.
(2) Not later than January 15 of the budget year if any of the
following are true:
(A) A taxing unit in a county intends to issue debt after
December 1 in the year preceding the budget year and has
indicated its intent to issue debt after December 1 in the year
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


preceding the budget year as specified in section 5 of this
chapter.
(B) A taxing unit intends to file a shortfall appeal under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-16 and has indicated its intent to file a shortfall
appeal as specified in section 5 of this chapter.
(C) The deadline for a city in the county to fix the budget, tax
rate, and tax levy has been extended, in accordance with
section 5.2 of this chapter, due to the executive's veto of the
ordinance fixing the budget, tax rate, and tax levy.
(l) Subject to the provisions of all applicable statutes, and
notwithstanding IC 6-1.1-18-1, the department of local government
finance shall, unless the department finds extenuating circumstances,
increase a political subdivision's tax levy to an amount that exceeds the
amount originally advertised or adopted by the political subdivision if:
(1) the increase is requested in writing by the officers of the
political subdivision;
(2) the request includes:
(A) the corrected budget, tax rate, or levy, as applicable; and
(B) the time and place of the meeting described in subdivision
(4);
(3) the political subdivision publishes the requested increase on
the department's advertising website;
(4) the political subdivision adopts the needed changes to its
budget, tax levy, or rate in a public meeting of the governing
body; and
(5) notice is given to the county fiscal body of the department's
correction.
The political subdivision shall publish notice of the meeting described
in subdivision (4) on the Indiana transparency website in the manner
prescribed by the department not later than forty-eight (48) hours
(excluding weekends and holidays) before the meeting. If the
department increases a levy beyond what was advertised or adopted
under this subsection, it shall, unless the department finds extenuating
circumstances, reduce the certified levy affected below the maximum
allowable levy by the lesser of five percent (5%) of the difference
between the advertised or adopted levy and the increased levy, or one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(m) If the department of local government finance has determined
that the proposed tax levy for a political subdivision's budget exceeds
the permissible tax levy for the political subdivision under section 23
of this chapter, the department of local government finance shall
calculate and certify the allowable tax levy and tax rate for the political
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


subdivision based on the provisions in section 23 of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-17-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 17. Subject to the limitations contained in
IC 6-1.1-18.5 and IC 20-46, and notwithstanding section 23 of this
chapter, the department of local government finance may at any time
increase the tax rate and tax levy of a political subdivision for the
following reasons:
(1) To pay the principal or interest upon a funding, refunding, or
judgment funding obligation of a political subdivision.
(2) To pay the interest or principal upon an outstanding obligation
of the political subdivision.
(3) To pay a judgment rendered against the political subdivision.
(4) To pay lease rentals that have become an obligation of the
political subdivision under IC 20-47-2 or IC 20-47-3.
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-17-23 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 23. (a) This section applies beginning after December
31, 2028, to the formulation and adoption of a budget, tax rate, and tax
levy under this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any growth in a political subdivision's assessed
value in the previous year, the ad valorem property tax levy for the
budget of a political subdivision shall not exceed the ad valorem
property tax levy for its last preceding annual budget, except as
provided in subsections (c) and (d).
(c) The fiscal body of a political subdivision may by ordinance
authorize the proper officers of the political subdivision to formulate
and submit a budget, tax rate, and tax levy under section 3 of this
chapter that exceeds the ad valorem property tax levy restriction in
subsection (b), subject to all other limits under this article, if the
following conditions are met:
(1) The fiscal body of the political subdivision must hold a public
hearing at which the only item on the agenda is the proposal to
adopt an ordinance under this subsection. The hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with IC 5-14-1.5, and notice of the
hearing shall be published in accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(2) After conducting a public hearing under subdivision (1) and
subject to subdivision (3), the fiscal body of the political
subdivision may adopt an ordinance under this subsection, which
must contain:
(A) a general statement of the reasons for the tax levy and tax
rate increase;
(B) the dollar amount of the tax levy increase; and
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(C) the percentage increase in the tax rate from the previous
year.
(3) An ordinance may not be adopted under this section after the
date that is fifteen (15) days before the public hearing under
section 3 of this chapter.
(d) If an ordinance is adopted by the fiscal body of a political
subdivision under subsection (c), the limitation in subsection (b) shall
not apply and instead the ad valorem property tax levy for the budget
of the political subdivision shall not exceed the sum of:
(1) the ad valorem property tax levy for the political subdivision's
last preceding annual budget; plus
(2) the additional ad valorem property tax levy authorized in the
ordinance adopted by the fiscal body under subsection (c);
subject to all other limits under this article.
(e) The provisions of this section shall be applied to decrease the tax
rate of each political subdivision in which there was an increase in the
political subdivision's assessed value in the previous year, subject to
subsections (c) and (d).
SECTION 10. IC 6-1.1-18.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 59, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section, "Indiana
nonfarm personal income" means the estimate of total nonfarm
personal income for Indiana in a calendar year as computed by the
federal Bureau of Economic Analysis using any actual data for the
calendar year and any estimated data determined appropriate by the
federal Bureau of Economic Analysis.
(b) This subsection applies to the determination of a maximum
levy growth quotient for an ensuing calendar year that begins
before January 1, 2027. Except as provided in subsections (c) and (e),
for purposes of determining a civil taxing unit's maximum permissible
ad valorem property tax levy for an ensuing calendar year, the civil
taxing unit shall use the maximum levy growth quotient determined in
the last STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: For each of the six (6) calendar years immediately
preceding the year in which a budget is adopted under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for the ensuing calendar year, divide the Indiana
nonfarm personal income for the calendar year by the Indiana
nonfarm personal income for the calendar year immediately
preceding that calendar year, rounding to the nearest
one-thousandth (0.001).
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of the STEP ONE results.
STEP THREE: Divide the STEP TWO result by six (6), rounding
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


to the nearest one-thousandth (0.001).
STEP FOUR: Determine the lesser of the following:
(A) The STEP THREE quotient.
(B) One and six-hundredths (1.06).
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f), a school corporation shall
use for its operations fund maximum levy calculation under
IC 20-46-8-1 the maximum levy growth quotient determined in the last
STEP of the following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine for each school corporation, the average
annual growth in net assessed value using the three (3) calendar
years immediately preceding the year in which a budget is
adopted under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for the ensuing calendar year.
STEP TWO: Determine the greater of:
(A) zero (0); or
(B) the STEP ONE amount minus the sum of:
(i) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
subsection (b) minus one (1); plus
(ii) two-hundredths (0.02).
STEP THREE: Determine the lesser of:
(A) the STEP TWO amount; or
(B) four-hundredths (0.04).
STEP FOUR: Determine the sum of:
(A) the STEP THREE amount; plus
(B) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
subsection (b).
STEP FIVE: Determine the greater of:
(A) the STEP FOUR amount; or
(B) the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
subsection (b).
(d) The budget agency shall provide the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year to civil taxing units, school corporations,
and the department of local government finance before July 1 of each
year.
(e) This subsection applies only for purposes of determining the
maximum levy growth quotient to be used in determining a civil taxing
unit's maximum permissible ad valorem property tax levy in calendar
years 2024, 2025, and 2026. For purposes of determining the maximum
levy growth quotient in calendar years 2024, 2025, and 2026, instead
of the result determined in the last STEP in subsection (b), the
maximum levy growth quotient is determined in the last STEP of the
following STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the result of STEP FOUR of subsection
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(b), calculated as if this subsection was not in effect.
STEP TWO: Subtract one (1) from the STEP ONE result.
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO result by eight-tenths
(0.8).
STEP FOUR: Add one (1) to the STEP THREE result.
STEP FIVE: Determine the lesser of:
(A) the STEP FOUR result; or
(B) one and four-hundredths (1.04).
(f) This subsection applies only for purposes of determining the
maximum levy growth quotient to be used in determining a school
corporation's operations fund maximum levy in calendar years 2024,
2025, and 2026. For purposes of determining the maximum levy
growth quotient in calendar years 2024, 2025, and 2026, instead of the
result determined in the last STEP in subsection (c), the maximum levy
growth quotient is determined in the last STEP of the following
STEPS:
STEP ONE: Determine the result of STEP FIVE of subsection (c),
calculated as if this subsection was not in effect.
STEP TWO: Subtract one (1) from the STEP ONE result.
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO result by eight-tenths
(0.8).
STEP FOUR: Add one (1) to the STEP THREE result.
STEP FIVE: Determine the lesser of:
(A) the STEP FOUR result; or
(B) one and four-hundredths (1.04).
(g) This subsection applies to the determination of a maximum
levy growth quotient for an ensuing calendar year that begins after
December 31, 2026. For purposes of determining a maximum
permissible ad valorem property tax levy for a civil taxing unit for
an ensuing calendar year, the taxing unit shall use the maximum
levy growth quotient determined in the last STEP of the following
STEPS:
STEP ONE: For each of the six (6) calendar years
immediately preceding the year in which a budget is adopted
under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for the ensuing calendar year, divide the
Indiana nonfarm personal income for the calendar year by
the Indiana nonfarm personal income for the calendar year
immediately preceding that calendar year, rounding to the
nearest one-thousandth (0.001).
STEP TWO: Determine the sum of the STEP ONE results.
STEP THREE: Divide the STEP TWO result by six (6),
rounding to the nearest one-thousandth (0.001).
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


STEP FOUR: For the three (3) calendar years immediately
preceding the year in which a budget is adopted under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for the ensuing calendar year, determine the
taxing unit's average annual growth in net assessed value
expressed as a percentage.
STEP FIVE: Determine those taxing units with a STEP FOUR
percentage that exceeds twenty percent (20%) but is not more
than thirty percent (30%).
STEP SIX: Determine those taxing units with a STEP FOUR
percentage that is more than thirty percent (30%).
STEP SEVEN: Determine the following:
(A) For those taxing units that are not identified under
STEP FIVE or STEP SIX, the lesser of the following:
(i) The STEP THREE quotient.
(ii) One and six-hundredths (1.06).
(B) For those taxing units identified in STEP FIVE:
(i) The quotient determined under clause (A); plus
(ii) One-hundredth (0.01).
(C) For those taxing units identified in STEP SIX:
(i) The quotient determined under clause (A); plus
(ii) Two-hundredths (0.02).
SECTION 11. IC 6-1.1-18.5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 61, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 12. (a) Any civil taxing
unit that incurs increased costs resulting from annexation, a natural
disaster, an accident, or another unanticipated emergency, and
determines that it cannot carry out its governmental functions for an
ensuing calendar year under the levy limitations imposed by section 3
or 25 of this chapter, as applicable, may, subject to subsections (h) and
(i):
(1) before October 20 of the calendar year immediately preceding
the ensuing calendar year; or
(2) in the case of a request described in section 16 of this chapter,
before December 31 of the calendar year immediately preceding
the ensuing calendar year;
appeal to the department of local government finance for relief from
those levy limitations. In the appeal the civil taxing unit must state that
it will be unable to carry out the governmental functions committed to
it by law unless it is given the authority that it is petitioning for. The
civil taxing unit must support these allegations by reasonably detailed
statements of fact.
(b) The department of local government finance shall immediately
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


proceed to the examination and consideration of the merits of the civil
taxing unit's appeal.
(c) In considering an appeal, the department of local government
finance has the power to conduct hearings, require any officer or
member of the appealing civil taxing unit to appear before it, or require
any officer or member of the appealing civil taxing unit to provide the
department with any relevant records or books.
(d) If an officer or member:
(1) fails to appear at a hearing after having been given written
notice requiring that person's attendance; or
(2) fails to produce the books and records that the department by
written notice required the officer or member to produce;
then the department may file an affidavit in the circuit court, superior
court, or probate court in the jurisdiction in which the officer or
member may be found setting forth the facts of the failure.
(e) Upon the filing of an affidavit under subsection (d), the court
shall promptly issue a summons, and the sheriff of the county within
which the court is sitting shall serve the summons. The summons must
command the officer or member to appear before the department to
provide information to the department or to produce books and records
for the department's use, as the case may be. Disobedience of the
summons constitutes, and is punishable as, a contempt of the court that
issued the summons.
(f) All expenses incident to the filing of an affidavit under
subsection (d) and the issuance and service of a summons shall be
charged to the officer or member against whom the summons is issued,
unless the court finds that the officer or member was acting in good
faith and with reasonable cause. If the court finds that the officer or
member was acting in good faith and with reasonable cause or if an
affidavit is filed and no summons is issued, the expenses shall be
charged against the county in which the affidavit was filed and shall be
allowed by the proper fiscal officers of that county.
(g) The fiscal officer of a civil taxing unit that appeals under section
16 of this chapter for relief from levy limitations shall immediately file
a copy of the appeal petition with the county auditor and the county
treasurer of the county in which the unit is located.
(h) This subsection applies to a civil taxing unit whose budget for
the upcoming year is subject to review by a fiscal body under:
(1) IC 6-1.1-17-20;
(2) IC 6-1.1-17-20.3; or
(3) IC 6-1.1-17-20.4.
A civil taxing unit described in this subsection may not submit an
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


appeal under this section unless the civil taxing unit receives approval
from the appropriate fiscal body to submit the appeal.
(i) A participating unit of a fire protection territory may not submit
an appeal under this section unless each participating unit of the fire
protection territory has adopted a resolution approving submission of
the appeal.
SECTION 12. IC 6-1.1-18.5-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 62, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 13. With respect to an
appeal filed under section 12 of this chapter, the department may find
that a civil taxing unit should receive any one (1) or more of the
following types of the following relief:
(1) Permission to the civil taxing unit to increase its levy in excess
of the limitations established under section 3 or 25 of this chapter,
as applicable, if in the judgment of the department the increase is
reasonably necessary due to increased costs of the civil taxing
unit resulting from annexation, consolidation, or other
extensions of governmental services by the civil taxing unit to
additional geographic areas. With respect to annexation,
consolidation, or other extensions of governmental services in
a calendar year, if those increased costs are incurred by the civil
taxing unit in that calendar year and more than one (1)
immediately succeeding calendar year, the unit may appeal under
section 12 of this chapter for permission to increase its levy under
this subdivision based on those increased costs in any of the
following:
(A) The first calendar year in which those costs are incurred.
(B) One (1) or more of the immediately succeeding four (4)
calendar years.
(2) Permission to the civil taxing unit to increase its levy in
excess of the limitations established under section 3 or 25 of
this chapter, as applicable, if the department finds that the
quotient determined under STEP SIX of the following
formula is equal to or greater than one and two-hundredths
(1.02):
STEP ONE: Determine the three (3) calendar years that
most immediately precede the ensuing calendar year.
STEP TWO: Compute separately, for each of the calendar
years determined in STEP ONE, the quotient (rounded to
the nearest ten-thousandth (0.0001)) of the sum of the civil
taxing unit's total assessed value of all taxable property
divided by the sum determined under this STEP for the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


calendar year immediately preceding the particular
calendar year.
STEP THREE: Divide the sum of the three (3) quotients
computed in STEP TWO by three (3).
STEP FOUR: Compute separately, for each of the
calendar years determined in STEP ONE, the quotient
(rounded to the nearest ten-thousandth (0.0001)) of the
sum of the total assessed value of all taxable property in all
counties divided by the sum determined under this STEP
for the calendar year immediately preceding the particular
calendar year.
STEP FIVE: Divide the sum of the three (3) quotients
computed in STEP FOUR by three (3).
STEP SIX: Divide the STEP THREE amount by the STEP
FIVE amount.
The civil taxing unit may increase its levy by a percentage not
greater than the percentage by which the STEP THREE
amount exceeds the percentage by which the civil taxing unit
may increase its levy under section 3 or 25 of this chapter, as
applicable, based on the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under section 2 of this chapter.
(2) (3) Permission to a civil taxing unit to increase its levy in
excess of the limitations established under section 3 or 25 of this
chapter, as applicable, if the department determines that the civil
taxing unit cannot carry out its governmental functions for an
ensuing calendar year under the levy limitations imposed by
section 3 or 25 of this chapter, as applicable, due to a natural
disaster, an accident, or another unanticipated emergency.
SECTION 13. IC 6-1.1-18.5-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 25. (a) The ad valorem
property tax levy limits imposed under section 3 of this chapter do not
apply to a municipality in a year if all the following apply:
(1) The percentage growth in the municipality's assessed value for
the preceding year compared to the year before the preceding year
is at least two (2) times the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under section 2 of this chapter for the preceding year.
(2) The municipality's population increased by at least one
hundred fifty percent (150%) between the last two (2) decennial
censuses. The computation of an increase of one hundred fifty
percent (150%) under this subdivision shall be determined
according to the last STEP of the following STEPS:
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


STEP ONE: Determine the municipality's population as
tabulated following the first decennial census.
STEP TWO: Determine the municipality's population as
tabulated following the second decennial census.
STEP THREE: Multiply the amount determined under STEP
ONE by a factor of two and five-tenths (2.5).
STEP FOUR: Determine whether the population determined
under STEP TWO is greater than or equal to the STEP THREE
product.
(b) A municipality that meets all the requirements under subsection
(a) may increase its ad valorem property tax levy in excess of the limits
imposed under section 3 of this chapter by a percentage equal to the
lesser of:
(1) the percentage growth in the municipality's assessed value for
the preceding year compared to the year before the preceding
year; or
(2) six percent (6%).
(c) A municipality's maximum levy growth that results from either
annexation or the pass through of assessed value from a tax increment
financing district may not be included for the purposes of determining
a municipality's maximum levy growth under this section.
(d) This section applies to property tax levies imposed after
December 31, 2016. and before January 1, 2026.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 14. IC 6-1.1-20-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 65, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) As used in this chapter, "controlled
project" means any project financed by bonds or a lease, except for the
following:
(1) A project for which the political subdivision reasonably
expects to pay:
(A) debt service; or
(B) lease rentals;
from funds other than property taxes that are exempt from the
levy limitations of IC 6-1.1-18.5 or (before January 1, 2009)
IC 20-45-3. A project is not a controlled project even though the
political subdivision has pledged to levy property taxes to pay the
debt service or lease rentals if those other funds are insufficient.
(2) Subject to subsection (b), a project that will not cost the
political subdivision more than the lesser of the following:
(A) An amount equal to the following:
(i) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


January 1, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, two million
dollars ($2,000,000).
(ii) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted after
December 31, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, five million dollars ($5,000,000).
(iii) In the case of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a
calendar year after December 31, 2018, making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, an amount (as determined by the
department of local government finance) equal to the result
of the maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the amount
determined under this clause for the preceding calendar
year.
The department of local government finance shall publish the
threshold determined under item (iii) in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the date
the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth quotient
for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(B) An amount equal to the following:
(i) One percent (1%) of the total gross assessed value of
property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date, if that total gross assessed value is more
than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).
(ii) One million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date is not more than one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000).
(3) (2) A project that is being refinanced for the purpose of
providing gross or net present value savings to taxpayers.
(4) (3) A project for which bonds were issued or leases were
entered into before January 1, 1996, or where the state board of
tax commissioners has approved the issuance of bonds or the
execution of leases before January 1, 1996.
(5) (4) A project that:
(A) is required by a court order holding that a federal law
mandates the project; or
(B) is in response to a court order holding that:
(i) a federal law has been violated; and
(ii) the project is to address the deficiency or violation.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(6) (5) A project that is in response to:
(A) a natural disaster;
(B) an accident; or
(C) an emergency;
in the political subdivision that makes a building or facility
unavailable for its intended use.
(7) (6) A project that was not a controlled project under this
section as in effect on June 30, 2008, and for which:
(A) the bonds or lease for the project were issued or entered
into before July 1, 2008; or
(B) the issuance of the bonds or the execution of the lease for
the project was approved by the department of local
government finance before July 1, 2008.
(8) (7) A project of the Little Calumet River basin development
commission for which bonds are payable from special
assessments collected under IC 14-13-2-18.6.
(9) (8) A project for engineering, land and right-of-way
acquisition, construction, resurfacing, maintenance, restoration,
and rehabilitation exclusively for or of:
(A) local road and street systems, including bridges that are
designated as being in a local road and street system;
(B) arterial road and street systems, including bridges that are
designated as being in an arterial road and street system; or
(C) any combination of local and arterial road and street
systems, including designated bridges.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted under
IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for which an
ordinance or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue
bonds or enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025. If:
(1) a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is more than
forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
value; and
(2) subsection (a)(1) and subsection (a)(3) through (a)(9) (a)(8)
are not applicable;
the term includes any project to be financed by bonds or a lease.
including a project that does not otherwise meet the threshold amount
provided in subsection (a)(2). This subsection expires December 31,
2025. For purposes of this subsection, a political subdivision's total
debt service tax rate does not include a tax rate imposed in a
referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
(c) This subsection applies to a project for which an ordinance or
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


resolution making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter
into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025. If subsection (a)(1) and
subsection (a)(3) through (a)(9) (a)(8) are not applicable, the term
includes any project to be financed by bonds or a lease including a
project that does not otherwise meet the threshold amount provided in
subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) in the case of a school corporation, the school corporation's
total debt service tax rate is more than forty cents ($0.40) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value;
(2) in the case of a city, county, or town, the city's, county's, or
town's total debt service tax rate is more than twenty-five cents
($0.25) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value; or
(3) in the case of a political subdivision not described in
subdivision (1) or (2), the political subdivision's total debt service
tax rate is more than five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars
($100) of assessed value.
However, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the tax rates under this subsection by a percentage amount equal
to the percentage increase in a political subdivision's tax rate that
results solely from the statutory changes that were enacted in
P.L.68-2025, under IC 6-1.1-12 (property tax deductions) and
IC 6-1.1-3-7.2 (business personal property tax exemption), if any.
This subsection does not apply to a project for which a public hearing
to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted under
IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For purposes of this subsection, a
political subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not include a tax
rate imposed in a referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
SECTION 15. IC 6-1.1-20-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) Subject to section 3.5(a)(1)(C) of this
chapter, This section applies only to the following:
(1) A controlled project (as defined in section 1.1 of this chapter
as in effect June 30, 2008) for which the proper officers of a
political subdivision make a preliminary determination in the
manner described in subsection (b) before July 1, 2008.
(2) An elementary school building, middle school building, high
school building, or other school building for academic instruction
that:
(A) is a controlled project; and
(B) will be used for any combination of kindergarten through
grade 12. and
(C) will not cost more than the lesser of the following:
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or
resolution adopted after December 31, 2017, and before
January 1, 2019, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000). In the case
of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is an amount (as determined by the department of
local government finance) equal to the result of the
maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the threshold
amount determined under this item for the preceding
calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount determined
under this item that applies for a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, the department of local government
finance shall publish the threshold in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the
date the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), or ten
million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(3) Any other controlled project that:
(A) is not a controlled project described in subdivision (1) or
(2); and
(B) will not cost the political subdivision more than the lesser
of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). In the case of an
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


ordinance or resolution adopted after December 31, 2017,
and before January 1, 2019, making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project, the threshold amount is fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or resolution
adopted in a calendar year after December 31, 2018, making
a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, the threshold amount is an amount (as
determined by the department of local government finance)
equal to the result of the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by
the threshold amount determined under this item for the
preceding calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount
determined under this item that applies for a calendar year
after December 31, 2018, the department of local
government finance shall publish the threshold in the
Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60)
days after the date the budget agency releases the maximum
levy growth quotient for the ensuing year under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or
one million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(4) (3) A controlled project funded by debt service if the scope of
the project changes from the purpose of the project initially
advertised to taxpayers as determined under section 4.2(c) of this
chapter.
(5) This subdivision does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted
under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for which
an ordinance or resolution making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease is adopted after June 30, 2025.
Any other controlled project if both of the following apply:
(A) The political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value, but less than eighty cents ($0.80) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
This subdivision expires December 31, 2025. For purposes of this
subdivision, a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate
does not include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service
levy approved by voters.
(6) (4) Any other controlled project if the following apply:
(A) An ordinance or resolution making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project is adopted. after June 30, 2025.
(B) The controlled project is not otherwise described in section
3.5(a)(1) of this chapter.
(C) In the case of a:
(i) school corporation, the school corporation's total debt
service tax rate is more than forty cents ($0.40) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not more than
seventy cents ($0.70) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value;
(ii) city, county, or town, the city's, county's, or town's total
debt service tax rate is more than twenty-five cents ($0.25)
per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, but not
more than forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100)
of assessed value; or
(iii) political subdivision not described in item (i) or (ii), the
political subdivision's total debt service tax rate is more than
five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value, but not more than ten cents ($0.10) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.
However, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the tax rates under this subsection by a percentage
amount equal to the percentage increase in a political
subdivision's tax rate that results solely from the statutory
changes that were enacted in P.L.68-2025, under IC 6-1.1-12
(property tax deductions) and IC 6-1.1-3-7.2 (business
personal property tax exemption), if any. This subdivision does
not apply to a project for which a public hearing to issue bonds or
enter into a lease has been conducted under IC 20-26-7-37 before
July 1, 2025. For purposes of this subdivision, a political
subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not include a tax rate
imposed in a referendum debt service tax levy approved by voters.
(b) A political subdivision may not impose property taxes to pay
debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease for a controlled project
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


without completing the following procedures:
(1) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall publish
notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and send notice by first class
mail to the circuit court clerk and to any organization that delivers
to the officers, before January 1 of that year, an annual written
request for such notices of any meeting to consider adoption of a
resolution or an ordinance making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease and shall conduct at least two (2)
public hearings on a preliminary determination before adoption
of the resolution or ordinance. The political subdivision must at
each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination
allow the public to testify regarding the preliminary determination
and must make the following information available to the public
at each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination,
in addition to any other information required by law:
(A) The result of the political subdivision's current and
projected annual debt service payments divided by the net
assessed value of taxable property within the political
subdivision.
(B) The result of:
(i) the sum of the political subdivision's outstanding long
term debt plus the outstanding long term debt of other taxing
units that include any of the territory of the political
subdivision; divided by
(ii) the net assessed value of taxable property within the
political subdivision.
(C) The information specified in subdivision (3)(A) through
(3)(H).
(2) When the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
a controlled project, the officers shall give notice of the
preliminary determination by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk and to the
organizations described in subdivision (1).
(3) A notice under subdivision (2) of the preliminary
determination of the political subdivision to issue bonds or enter
into a lease for a controlled project must include the following
information:
(A) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(B) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the
maximum lease rental for the lease.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(C) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(D) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
(E) A statement that any owners of property within the
political subdivision or registered voters residing within the
political subdivision who want to initiate a petition and
remonstrance process against the proposed debt service or
lease payments must file a petition that complies with
subdivisions (4) and (5) not later than thirty (30) days after
publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1.
(F) With respect to bonds issued or a lease entered into to
open:
(i) a new school facility; or
(ii) an existing facility that has not been used for at least
three (3) years and that is being reopened to provide
additional classroom space;
the estimated costs the school corporation expects to incur
annually to operate the facility.
(G) A statement of whether the school corporation expects to
appeal for a new facility adjustment (as defined in
IC 20-45-1-16 (repealed) before January 1, 2009) for an
increased maximum permissible tuition support levy to pay the
estimated costs described in clause (F) (before its repeal).
(H) The following information:
(i) The political subdivision's current debt service levy and
rate.
(ii) The estimated increase to the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result if the political
subdivision issues the bonds or enters into the lease.
(iii) The estimated amount of the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result during the following ten
(10) years if the political subdivision issues the bonds or
enters into the lease, after also considering any changes that
will occur to the debt service levy and rate during that
period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during that period.
(I) The information specified in subdivision (1)(A) through
(1)(B).
(4) After notice is given, a petition requesting the application of
a petition and remonstrance process may be filed by the lesser of:
(A) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


residing within the political subdivision; or
(B) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the political subdivision.
(5) The state board of accounts shall design and, upon request by
the county voter registration office, deliver to the county voter
registration office or the county voter registration office's
designated printer the petition forms to be used solely in the
petition process described in this section. The county voter
registration office shall issue to an owner or owners of property
within the political subdivision or a registered voter residing
within the political subdivision the number of petition forms
requested by the owner or owners or the registered voter. Each
form must be accompanied by instructions detailing the
requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature; and
(D) govern the closing date for the petition period.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition must indicate
whether the person is signing the petition as a registered voter
within the political subdivision or is signing the petition as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition as a registered voter must indicate the address at
which the person is registered to vote. A person who signs a
petition as an owner of property must indicate the address of the
property owned by the person in the political subdivision.
(6) Each petition must be verified under oath by at least one (1)
qualified petitioner in a manner prescribed by the state board of
accounts before the petition is filed with the county voter
registration office under subdivision (7).
(7) Each petition must be filed with the county voter registration
office not more than thirty (30) days after publication under
subdivision (2) of the notice of the preliminary determination.
(8) The county voter registration office shall determine whether
each person who signed the petition is a registered voter.
However, after the county voter registration office has determined
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons who signed
the petition are registered voters within the political subdivision,
the county voter registration office is not required to verify
whether the remaining persons who signed the petition are
registered voters. If the county voter registration office does not
determine that at least five hundred twenty-five (525) persons
who signed the petition are registered voters, the county voter
registration office shall, not more than fifteen (15) business days
after receiving a petition, forward a copy of the petition to the
county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business days after
receiving the copy of the petition, the county auditor shall provide
to the county voter registration office a statement verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition as a registered
voter but is not a registered voter, as determined by the county
voter registration office, is the owner of property in the
political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition as an owner of
property within the political subdivision does in fact own
property within the political subdivision.
(9) The county voter registration office, not more than ten (10)
business days after determining that at least five hundred
twenty-five (525) persons who signed the petition are registered
voters or receiving the statement from the county auditor under
subdivision (8), as applicable, shall make the final determination
of the number of petitioners that are registered voters in the
political subdivision and, based on the statement provided by the
county auditor, the number of petitioners that own property within
the political subdivision. Whenever the name of an individual
who signs a petition form as a registered voter contains a minor
variation from the name of the registered voter as set forth in the
records of the county voter registration office, the signature is
presumed to be valid, and there is a presumption that the
individual is entitled to sign the petition under this section. Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition
only one (1) time in a particular petition and remonstrance
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


process under this chapter, regardless of whether the person owns
more than one (1) parcel of real property, mobile home assessed
as personal property, or manufactured home assessed as personal
property, or a combination of those types of property within the
subdivision and regardless of whether the person is both a
registered voter in the political subdivision and the owner of
property within the political subdivision. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, if a petition is presented to the
county voter registration office within forty-five (45) days before
an election, the county voter registration office may defer acting
on the petition, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(10) The county voter registration office must file a certificate and
each petition with:
(A) the township trustee, if the political subdivision is a
township, who shall present the petition or petitions to the
township board; or
(B) the body that has the authority to authorize the issuance of
the bonds or the execution of a lease, if the political
subdivision is not a township;
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of the petition
requesting a petition and remonstrance process. The certificate
must state the number of petitioners that are owners of property
within the political subdivision and the number of petitioners who
are registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
If a sufficient petition requesting a petition and remonstrance process
is not filed by owners of property or registered voters as set forth in this
section, the political subdivision may issue bonds or enter into a lease
by following the provisions of law relating to the bonds to be issued or
lease to be entered into.
(c) A political subdivision may not divide a controlled project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. A person that owns property within a political subdivision or
a person that is a registered voter residing within a political subdivision
may file a petition with the department of local government finance
objecting that the political subdivision has divided a controlled project
in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter. The petition must be filed not more than ten (10) days after the
political subdivision gives notice of the political subdivision's decision
to issue bonds or enter into leases for a capital project that the person
believes is the result of a division of a controlled project that is
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


prohibited by this subsection. If the department of local government
finance receives a petition under this subsection, the department shall
not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the petition make a final
determination on the issue of whether the political subdivision divided
a controlled project in order to avoid the requirements of this section
and section 3.2 of this chapter. If the department of local government
finance determines that a political subdivision divided a controlled
project in order to avoid the requirements of this section and section
3.2 of this chapter and the political subdivision continues to desire to
proceed with the project, the political subdivision shall fulfill the
requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this chapter, if
applicable, regardless of the cost of the project in dispute. A political
subdivision shall be considered to have divided a capital project in
order to avoid the requirements of this section and section 3.2 of this
chapter if the result of one (1) or more of the subprojects cannot
reasonably be considered an independently desirable end in itself
without reference to another capital project. This subsection does not
prohibit a political subdivision from undertaking a series of capital
projects in which the result of each capital project can reasonably be
considered an independently desirable end in itself without reference
to another capital project.
SECTION 16. IC 6-1.1-20-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) This section applies only to a controlled
project that meets the following conditions:
(1) The controlled project is described in one (1) of the following
categories:
(A) An elementary school building, middle school building,
high school building, or other school building for academic
instruction that will be used for any combination of
kindergarten through grade 12 and will cost more than the
lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or
resolution adopted after December 31, 2017, and before
January 1, 2019, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000). In the case
of an ordinance or resolution adopted in a calendar year after
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


December 31, 2018, making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease for the project, the threshold
amount is an amount (as determined by the department of
local government finance) equal to the result of the
maximum levy growth quotient determined under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by the threshold
amount determined under this item for the preceding
calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount determined
under this item that applies for a calendar year after
December 31, 2018, the department of local government
finance shall publish the threshold in the Indiana Register
under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60) days after the
date the budget agency releases the maximum levy growth
quotient for the ensuing year under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), or ten
million dollars ($10,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(B) Any other controlled project that is not a controlled project
described in clause (A) and will cost the political subdivision
more than the lesser of the following:
(i) The threshold amount determined under this item. In the
case of an ordinance or resolution adopted before January 1,
2018, making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into a lease for the project, the threshold amount is
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). In the case of an
ordinance or resolution adopted after December 31, 2017,
and before January 1, 2019, making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease for the
project, the threshold amount is fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). In the case of an ordinance or resolution
adopted in a calendar year after December 31, 2018, making
a preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a
lease for the project, the threshold amount is an amount (as
determined by the department of local government finance)
equal to the result of the maximum levy growth quotient
determined under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2 for the year multiplied by
the threshold amount determined under this item for the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


preceding calendar year. In the case of a threshold amount
determined under this item that applies for a calendar year
after December 31, 2018, the department of local
government finance shall publish the threshold in the
Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7 not more than sixty (60)
days after the date the budget agency releases the maximum
levy growth quotient for the ensuing year under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-2.
(ii) An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total gross
assessed value of property within the political subdivision
on the last assessment date, if that total gross assessed value
is more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or
one million dollars ($1,000,000), if the total gross assessed
value of property within the political subdivision on the last
assessment date is not more than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(C) Any other controlled project for which a political
subdivision adopts an ordinance or resolution making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease
for the project, if the sum of:
(i) the cost of that controlled project; plus
(ii) the costs of all other controlled projects for which the
political subdivision has previously adopted within the
preceding three hundred sixty-five (365) days an ordinance
or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue
bonds or enter into a lease for those other controlled
projects;
exceeds twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).
(D) (A) A controlled project funded by debt service if the
scope of the project changes from the purpose of the project
initially advertised to taxpayers as determined under section
4.3(c) of this chapter.
(E) This clause does not apply to a project for which a public
hearing to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted
under IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2023, or to a project for
which an ordinance or resolution making a preliminary
determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease is adopted
after June 30, 2025. Except as provided in section 4.5 of this
chapter, any other controlled project if the political
subdivision's total debt service tax rate is at least eighty cents
($0.80) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value. This
clause expires December 31, 2025. For purposes of this clause,
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not
include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service tax
levy approved by voters.
(F) (B) Except as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter, any
other project for which an ordinance or resolution making a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease
is adopted, after June 30, 2025, if:
(i) in the case of a school corporation, the school
corporation's total debt service tax rate is more than seventy
cents ($0.70) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
value;
(ii) in the case of a city, county, or town, the city's, county's,
or town's total debt service tax rate is more than forty cents
($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value; or
(iii) in the case of a political subdivision not described in
item (i) or (ii), the political subdivision's total debt service
tax rate is more than ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred
dollars ($100) of assessed value.
However, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the tax rates under this subsection by a percentage
amount equal to the percentage increase in a political
subdivision's tax rate that results solely from the statutory
changes that were enacted in P.L.68-2025, under
IC 6-1.1-12 (property tax deductions) and IC 6-1.1-3-7.2
(business personal property tax exemption), if any. This
clause does not apply to a project for which a public hearing
to issue bonds or enter into a lease has been conducted under
IC 20-26-7-37 before July 1, 2025. For purposes of this clause,
a political subdivision's total debt service tax rate does not
include a tax rate imposed in a referendum debt service tax
levy approved by voters.
(2) The proper officers of the political subdivision make a
preliminary determination after June 30, 2008, in the manner
described in subsection (b) to issue bonds or enter into a lease for
the controlled project.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), a political subdivision may not impose
property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals on a lease
for a controlled project without completing the following procedures:
(1) The proper officers of a political subdivision shall publish
notice in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and send notice by first class
mail to the circuit court clerk and to any organization that delivers
to the officers, before January 1 of that year, an annual written
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


request for notices of any meeting to consider the adoption of an
ordinance or a resolution making a preliminary determination to
issue bonds or enter into a lease and shall conduct at least two (2)
public hearings on the preliminary determination before adoption
of the ordinance or resolution. The political subdivision must at
each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination
allow the public to testify regarding the preliminary determination
and must make the following information available to the public
at each of the public hearings on the preliminary determination,
in addition to any other information required by law:
(A) The result of the political subdivision's current and
projected annual debt service payments divided by the net
assessed value of taxable property within the political
subdivision.
(B) The result of:
(i) the sum of the political subdivision's outstanding long
term debt plus the outstanding long term debt of other taxing
units that include any of the territory of the political
subdivision; divided by
(ii) the net assessed value of taxable property within the
political subdivision.
(C) The information specified in subdivision (3)(A) through
(3)(G).
(2) If the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease, the
officers shall give notice of the preliminary determination by:
(A) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(B) first class mail to the circuit court clerk and to the
organizations described in subdivision (1).
(3) A notice under subdivision (2) of the preliminary
determination of the political subdivision to issue bonds or enter
into a lease must include the following information:
(A) The maximum term of the bonds or lease.
(B) The maximum principal amount of the bonds or the
maximum lease rental for the lease.
(C) The estimated interest rates that will be paid and the total
interest costs associated with the bonds or lease.
(D) The purpose of the bonds or lease.
(E) A statement that the proposed debt service or lease
payments must be approved in an election on a local public
question held under section 3.6 of this chapter.
(F) With respect to bonds issued or a lease entered into to
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


open:
(i) a new school facility; or
(ii) an existing facility that has not been used for at least
three (3) years and that is being reopened to provide
additional classroom space;
the estimated costs the school corporation expects to annually
incur to operate the facility.
(G) The following information:
(i) The political subdivision's current debt service levy and
rate.
(ii) The estimated increase to the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result if the political
subdivision issues the bonds or enters into the lease.
(iii) The estimated amount of the political subdivision's debt
service levy and rate that will result during the following ten
(10) years if the political subdivision issues the bonds or
enters into the lease, after also considering any changes that
will occur to the debt service levy and rate during that
period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during that period.
(H) The information specified in subdivision (1)(A) through
(1)(B).
(4) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). After notice is given, a petition requesting
the application of the local public question process under section
3.6 of this chapter may be filed by the lesser of:
(A) five hundred (500) persons who are either owners of
property within the political subdivision or registered voters
residing within the political subdivision; or
(B) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the political subdivision.
(5) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The state board of accounts shall design and,
upon request by the county voter registration office, deliver to the
county voter registration office or the county voter registration
office's designated printer the petition forms to be used solely in
the petition process described in this section. The county voter
registration office shall issue to an owner or owners of property
within the political subdivision or a registered voter residing
within the political subdivision the number of petition forms
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


requested by the owner or owners or the registered voter. Each
form must be accompanied by instructions detailing the
requirements that:
(A) the carrier and signers must be owners of property or
registered voters;
(B) the carrier must be a signatory on at least one (1) petition;
(C) after the signatures have been collected, the carrier must
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature; and
(D) govern the closing date for the petition period.
Persons requesting forms may be required to identify themselves
as owners of property or registered voters and may be allowed to
pick up additional copies to distribute to other owners of property
or registered voters. Each person signing a petition must indicate
whether the person is signing the petition as a registered voter
within the political subdivision or is signing the petition as the
owner of property within the political subdivision. A person who
signs a petition as a registered voter must indicate the address at
which the person is registered to vote. A person who signs a
petition as an owner of property must indicate the address of the
property owned by the person in the political subdivision.
(6) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). Each petition must be verified under oath by
at least one (1) qualified petitioner in a manner prescribed by the
state board of accounts before the petition is filed with the county
voter registration office under subdivision (7).
(7) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). Each petition must be filed with the county
voter registration office not more than thirty (30) days after
publication under subdivision (2) of the notice of the preliminary
determination.
(8) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office shall
determine whether each person who signed the petition is a
registered voter. However, after the county voter registration
office has determined that at least five hundred twenty-five (525)
persons who signed the petition are registered voters within the
political subdivision, the county voter registration office is not
required to verify whether the remaining persons who signed the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


petition are registered voters. If the county voter registration
office does not determine that at least five hundred twenty-five
(525) persons who signed the petition are registered voters, the
county voter registration office, not more than fifteen (15)
business days after receiving a petition, shall forward a copy of
the petition to the county auditor. Not more than ten (10) business
days after receiving the copy of the petition, the county auditor
shall provide to the county voter registration office a statement
verifying:
(A) whether a person who signed the petition as a registered
voter but is not a registered voter, as determined by the county
voter registration office, is the owner of property in the
political subdivision; and
(B) whether a person who signed the petition as an owner of
property within the political subdivision does in fact own
property within the political subdivision.
(9) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office, not
more than ten (10) business days after determining that at least
five hundred twenty-five (525) persons who signed the petition
are registered voters or after receiving the statement from the
county auditor under subdivision (8), as applicable, shall make
the final determination of whether a sufficient number of persons
have signed the petition. Whenever the name of an individual who
signs a petition form as a registered voter contains a minor
variation from the name of the registered voter as set forth in the
records of the county voter registration office, the signature is
presumed to be valid, and there is a presumption that the
individual is entitled to sign the petition under this section. Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, in determining whether an
individual is a registered voter, the county voter registration office
shall apply the requirements and procedures used under IC 3 to
determine whether a person is a registered voter for purposes of
voting in an election governed by IC 3. However, an individual is
not required to comply with the provisions concerning providing
proof of identification to be considered a registered voter for
purposes of this chapter. A person is entitled to sign a petition
only one (1) time in a particular referendum process under this
chapter, regardless of whether the person owns more than one (1)
parcel of real property, mobile home assessed as personal
property, or manufactured home assessed as personal property or
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


a combination of those types of property within the political
subdivision and regardless of whether the person is both a
registered voter in the political subdivision and the owner of
property within the political subdivision. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this section, if a petition is presented to the
county voter registration office within forty-five (45) days before
an election, the county voter registration office may defer acting
on the petition, and the time requirements under this section for
action by the county voter registration office do not begin to run
until five (5) days after the date of the election.
(10) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). The county voter registration office must file
a certificate and each petition with:
(A) the township trustee, if the political subdivision is a
township, who shall present the petition or petitions to the
township board; or
(B) the body that has the authority to authorize the issuance of
the bonds or the execution of a lease, if the political
subdivision is not a township;
within thirty-five (35) business days of the filing of the petition
requesting the referendum process. The certificate must state the
number of petitioners who are owners of property within the
political subdivision and the number of petitioners who are
registered voters residing within the political subdivision.
(11) This subdivision does not apply to a controlled project
described in subsection (a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or
subsection (a)(1)(F). If a sufficient petition requesting the local
public question process is not filed by owners of property or
registered voters as set forth in this section, the political
subdivision may issue bonds or enter into a lease by following the
provisions of law relating to the bonds to be issued or lease to be
entered into.
(c) If the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds or enter into a lease, the
officers shall provide to the county auditor:
(1) a copy of the notice required by subsection (b)(2); and
(2) any other information the county auditor requires to fulfill the
county auditor's duties under section 3.6 of this chapter.
(d) In addition to the procedures in subsection (b), if any capital
improvement components addressed in the most recent:
(1) threat assessment of the buildings within the school
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


corporation; or
(2) school safety plan (as described in IC 20-26-18.2-2(b));
concerning a particular school have not been completed or require
additional funding to be completed, before the school corporation may
impose property taxes to pay debt service on bonds or lease rentals for
a lease for a controlled project, and in addition to any other components
of the controlled project, the controlled project must include any capital
improvements necessary to complete those components described in
subdivisions (1) and (2) that have not been completed or that require
additional funding to be completed.
(e) In addition to the other procedures in this section, an ordinance
or resolution making a preliminary determination to issue bonds or
enter into leases that is considered for adoption must include a
statement of:
(1) the maximum annual debt service for the controlled project for
each year in which the debt service will be paid; and
(2) the schedule of the estimated annual tax levy and rate over a
ten (10) year period;
factoring in changes that will occur to the debt service levy and tax rate
during the period on account of any outstanding bonds or lease
obligations that will mature or terminate during the period.
SECTION 17. IC 6-1.1-20-3.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.239-2023,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.7. (a) This section applies to the following:
(1) The issuance of bonds or the entering into a lease for a
controlled project:
(A) to which section 3.5 of this chapter applies; and
(B) for which a sufficient petition requesting the application of
the local public question process under section 3.6 of this
chapter has not been filed as set forth in section 3.5 of this
chapter within the time required under section 3.5(b)(7) of this
chapter.
(2) The issuance of bonds or the entering into a lease for a capital
project:
(A) that is not a controlled project to which section 3.5 of this
chapter applies; and
(B) that would, but for the application of section 1.1(a)(6)
1.1(a)(5) of this chapter to the project, be a controlled project
to which section 3.5 of this chapter applies.
(b) If the proper officers of a political subdivision make a
preliminary determination to issue bonds described in subsection (a) or
enter into a lease described in subsection (a), the fiscal body of the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


political subdivision may adopt a resolution specifying that the local
public question process specified in section 3.6 of this chapter applies
to the issuance of the bonds or the entering into the lease,
notwithstanding that:
(1) a sufficient petition requesting the application of the local
public question process under section 3.6 of this chapter has not
been filed as set forth in section 3.5 of this chapter (in the case of
bonds or a lease described in subsection (a)(1)); or
(2) because of the application of section 1.1(a)(6) 1.1(a)(5) of this
chapter, the bonds or lease is not considered to be issued or
entered into for a controlled project (in the case of bonds or a
lease described in subsection (a)(2)).
(c) The following apply to the adoption of a resolution by the fiscal
body of a political subdivision under subsection (b):
(1) In the case of bonds or a lease described in subsection (a)(1)
and for which no petition requesting the application of the local
public question process under section 3.6 of this chapter has been
filed within the time required under section 3.5(b)(7) of this
chapter, the fiscal body must adopt the resolution not more than
sixty (60) days after publication of the notice of the preliminary
determination to issue the bonds or enter into the lease.
(2) In the case of bonds or a lease described in subsection (a)(1)
for which a petition requesting the application of the local public
question process under section 3.6 of this chapter:
(A) has been filed under section 3.5 of this chapter; and
(B) is determined to have an insufficient number of signatures
to require application of the local public question process
under section 3.6 of this chapter;
the fiscal body must adopt the resolution not more than thirty (30)
days after the county voter registration office makes the final
determination under section 3.5 of this chapter that a sufficient
number of persons have not signed the petition.
(3) In the case of bonds or a lease described in subsection (a)(2),
the fiscal body must adopt the resolution not more than thirty (30)
days after publication of the notice of the preliminary
determination to issue the bonds or enter into the lease.
(4) The fiscal body shall certify the resolution to the county
election board of each county in which the political subdivision
is located, and the county election board shall place the public
question on the ballot as provided in section 3.6 of this chapter.
(d) Except to the extent it is inconsistent with this section, section
3.6 of this chapter applies to a local public question placed on the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


ballot under this section.
SECTION 18. IC 6-1.1-20-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) As used in this section, "maintenance
emergency" refers to a response to a condition that is not otherwise
subject to the application of section 1.1(a)(6) 1.1(a)(5) of this chapter
and includes:
(1) repair of a boiler or chiller system;
(2) roof repair;
(3) storm damage repair; or
(4) any other repair that the department determines is a
maintenance emergency for which waiver of the application of
section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F)
3.5(a)(1)(B) of this chapter is warranted.
(b) A political subdivision may submit a request to the department
to waive the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration)
or 3.5(a)(1)(F) 3.5(a)(1)(B) of this chapter, if the proposed controlled
project of the political subdivision is to address a maintenance
emergency with respect to a building owned or leased by the political
subdivision.
(c) The department shall require the political subdivision to submit
any information that the department considers necessary to determine
whether the condition that the political subdivision contends is a
maintenance emergency.
(d) The department shall review a request and issue a determination
not later than forty-five (45) days after the department receives a
request under this section determining whether the condition that the
political subdivision contends is a maintenance emergency is sufficient
to waive the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration)
or 3.5(a)(1)(F) 3.5(a)(1)(B) of this chapter. If the department
determines that the condition is a maintenance emergency then section
3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F) 3.5(a)(1)(B) of this
chapter is waived and does not apply to the proposed controlled
project.
(e) A waiver of the application of section 3.5(a)(1)(E) (before its
expiration) or 3.5(a)(1)(F) 3.5(a)(1)(B) of this chapter in accordance
with this section may not be construed as a waiver of any other
requirement of this chapter with respect to the proposed controlled
project.
SECTION 19. IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 9.8. (a)
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


This section applies to property taxes first due and payable after
December 31, 2009.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Debt service obligations of a political subdivision" refers to:
(A) the principal and interest payable during a calendar year
on bonds; and
(B) lease rental payments payable during a calendar year on
leases;
of a political subdivision payable from ad valorem property taxes.
(2) "Protected taxes" refers to the following:
(A) Property taxes that are exempted from the application of
a credit granted under section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by
section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b), or 7.5(c) of this chapter or another
law.
(B) Property taxes imposed by a political subdivision to pay
for debt service obligations of a political subdivision that are
not exempted from the application of a credit granted under
section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b), or
7.5(c) of this chapter or any other law. Property taxes
described in this clause are subject to the credit granted under
section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b), or
7.5(c) of this chapter regardless of their designation as
protected taxes.
(3) "Unprotected taxes" refers to property taxes that are not
protected taxes.
(c) Except as provided in section 9.9 of this chapter, the total
amount of revenue to be distributed to the fund for which the protected
taxes were imposed shall be determined as if no credit were granted
under section 7, or 7.5, or 7.7 of this chapter or IC 6-1.1-51.3-1 or
IC 6-1.1-51.3-2. The total amount of the loss in revenue resulting from
the granting of credits under section 7, or 7.5, or 7.7 of this chapter or
IC 6-1.1-51.3-1 or IC 6-1.1-51.3-2 must reduce only the amount of
unprotected taxes distributed to a fund using the following criteria:
(1) The reduction may be allocated in the amounts determined by
the political subdivision using a combination of unprotected taxes
of the political subdivision in those taxing districts in which the
credit caused a reduction in protected taxes.
(2) The tax revenue and each fund of any other political
subdivisions must not be affected by the reduction.
(d) When:
(1) the revenue that otherwise would be distributed to a fund
receiving only unprotected taxes is reduced entirely under
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


subsection (c) and the remaining revenue is insufficient for a fund
receiving protected taxes to receive the revenue specified by
subsection (c); or
(2) there is not a fund receiving only unprotected taxes from
which to distribute revenue;
the revenue distributed to the fund receiving protected taxes must also
be reduced. If the revenue distributed to a fund receiving protected
taxes is reduced, the political subdivision may transfer money from one
(1) or more of the other funds of the political subdivision to offset the
loss in revenue to the fund receiving protected taxes. The transfer is
limited to the amount necessary for the fund receiving protected taxes
to receive the revenue specified under subsection (c). The amount
transferred shall be specifically identified as a debt service obligation
transfer for each affected fund.
SECTION 20. IC 6-1.1-54 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 54. Homestead Property Tax Liability Freeze for Low
Income Seniors
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to taxes first due and payable after
December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "homestead" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-1.1-12-37.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "property tax liability" means
liability for the tax imposed on homestead property determined
after application of all credits and deductions under this article,
except that the term:
(1) includes the portion of the property tax liability that is
attributable to a school operating referendum tax levy
approved under IC 20-46-1 or a school safety referendum tax
levy approved under IC 20-46-9, for purposes of the
determination for a qualified individual under section 6 of this
chapter; and
(2) does not include the portion of the property tax liability
that is attributable to a school operating referendum tax levy
approved under IC 20-46-1 or a school safety referendum tax
levy approved under IC 20-46-9, for purposes of the
determination for a qualified individual under section 7 of this
chapter.
The term does not include any interest or penalty imposed under
this article.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "senior qualified individual"
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


means an individual who:
(1) is at least sixty-five (65) years of age on or before
December 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which
the individual's property tax liability is first due and payable;
(2) is eligible for the homestead deduction under
IC 6-1.1-12-37 on the assessment date for which the
individual's property tax liability is imposed; and
(3) has an annual income that is at or below two hundred
percent (200%) of the federal poverty income level for the
calendar year preceding by two (2) years the calendar year in
which the individual's property tax liability is first due and
payable.
Sec. 5. A credit shall be applied against a senior qualified
individual's homestead property tax liability as set forth in this
chapter. The amount of the credit under this section is equal to:
(1) for the first calendar year for which the credit is applied,
the lesser of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
homestead property for the calendar year; or
(B) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
homestead property for the property tax liability first due
and payable on the homestead property for the
immediately preceding year; and
(2) for each calendar year after the first calendar year for
which the credit is applied, the lesser of:
(A) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
homestead property for the calendar year; or
(B) the property tax liability first due and payable on the
homestead property for the first calendar year for which
the credit is applied as determined under subdivision (1).
Sec. 6. If a physical change to taxable property results in an
increased assessment of the taxable property for an assessment
date for which property tax liability is imposed, the property tax
liability of a person for property taxes first due and payable for
that assessment date with respect to the taxable property is the sum
of the:
(1) amount of the person's property tax liability attributable
to the taxable property otherwise determined under section 5
of this chapter, whichever is applicable, for the calendar year;
plus
(2) amount of the person's property tax liability that is
directly attributable to the physical change in the taxable
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


property.
Sec. 7. If:
(1) the entire ownership interest; or
(2) any part of the ownership interest;
in the taxable property changes, the limitations in this chapter do
not apply to the determination of property tax liability for
property taxes first due and payable in the first calendar year
following the change in ownership. Instead, the amount of property
tax liability that is attributable to the taxable property for property
taxes first due and payable in that particular calendar year is the
amount of property tax liability as would otherwise be determined
under this article.
Sec. 8. A person is not required to file an application for the
credit under this chapter. The county auditor shall:
(1) identify the homestead property in the county eligible for
the credit under this chapter; and
(2) apply the credit under this chapter to homestead property
tax liability on the identified property.
SECTION 21. IC 6-3-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 6. (a) Each taxable year,
an individual who rents a dwelling for use as the individual's principal
place of residence may deduct from the individual's adjusted gross
income (as defined in IC 6-3-1-3.5(a)), the lesser of:
(1) the amount of rent paid by the individual with respect to the
dwelling during the taxable year; or
(2) three thousand dollars ($3,000). six thousand dollars
($6,000).
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a):
(1) a married couple filing a joint return for a particular taxable
year may not claim a deduction under this section of more than
three thousand dollars ($3,000); six thousand dollars ($6,000);
and
(2) a married individual filing a separate return for a particular
taxable year may not claim a deduction under this section of more
than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). three thousand
dollars ($3,000).
(c) The deduction provided by this section does not apply to an
individual who rents a dwelling that is exempt from Indiana property
tax.
(d) For purposes of this section, a "dwelling" includes a single
family dwelling and unit of a multi-family dwelling.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


SECTION 22. IC 6-3-2-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2024 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 30. (a) For purposes of
this section, "qualifying account" means any of the following
owned directly by an individual, either as a sole owner or jointly
with one (1) or more individuals:
(1) A retirement plan described in 4 U.S.C. 114(b)(1).
(2) A securities or commodities account.
(3) A savings or checking account.
(4) Any account substantially similar to an account described
in subdivision (2) or (3).
If an account listed in subdivisions (1) through (4) is owned in
whole or in part by a person or entity other than an individual, the
account is a qualifying account only to the extent it is owned
directly by an individual.
(b) For purposes of this section, "taxpayer" means an individual
subject to taxation under this article.
(c) For purposes of this section, "theft" means:
(1) an event for which a taxpayer would have been permitted
a deduction as a theft loss under Section 165(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code (as in effect on January 1, 2017); and
(2) the event was either:
(A) a distribution from the taxpayer's qualifying account;
or
(B) a sale, exchange, or liquidation of the taxpayer's stocks,
bonds, certificates of deposit, or similar instruments,
regardless of whether these were held in a qualifying
account;
followed by a payment to another individual or entity within
sixty (60) days of the distribution, sale, exchange, or
liquidation, and for which the distribution, sale, exchange, or
liquidation was induced by the individual or entity.
(d) For purposes of this section, "theft loss" means the amount
that an individual would have been permitted to deduct under
Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in effect on
January 1, 2017) as the result of a theft and that the individual was
not permitted to deduct in determining the individual's federal
adjusted gross income under Section 62 of the Internal Revenue
Code. For an individual who is not a resident of Indiana, the theft
loss amount shall only be the portion of the loss derived from
Indiana sources and only if the distribution would have been
included in the taxpayer's Indiana adjusted gross income.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(e) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, a
taxpayer is entitled to a deduction from the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income for a taxable year if the taxpayer:
(1) incurred a loss as the result of a theft during the taxable
year; and
(2) as a result of the theft, had federal gross income for the
taxable year that would not have been included in the
taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year
under Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code if the theft had
not occurred or been induced.
(f) The amount of the deduction for a taxable year is the lesser
of:
(1) the amount of the theft loss; or
(2) the amount reported in the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income under IC 6-3-1-3.5(a) for the taxable year that
resulted from the theft or inducement of theft.
(g) A taxpayer wishing to claim a deduction under this section
must first apply to the department for certification of the
deduction and provide all information requested by the
department relating to the theft to the department prior to
claiming the deduction under this section. The following apply:
(1) Upon receipt of a taxpayer's application, the department
shall determine the amount of the deduction for theft losses
that are allowable, if any, under this section and provide
notice of the determination and certification to the taxpayer.
(2) A taxpayer may claim the deduction on the taxpayer's
state tax return or returns only after the department's
determination and only up to the amount certified by the
department as an allowable deduction.
(3) If a taxpayer disagrees with the department's
determination of a theft loss deduction, the taxpayer may
protest the determination of the loss in the same manner and
under the same time periods as a refund denial under
IC 6-8.1-9-1.
(h) For purposes of this section:
(1) any amounts that an individual received as insurance
payments, reimbursement, or other similar payments in
recovery for a theft loss during the taxable year are not
deductible under this section; and
(2) to the extent that amounts in subdivision (1) are received
in a subsequent taxable year, the individual shall report the
amount received as an addition in determining adjusted gross
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


income under IC 6-3-1-3.5(a) for purposes of adjusted gross
income tax in the year in which the amount is received, but
only to the extent that the deduction under this section would
have been reduced in the taxable year of the theft had the
recovery amount been received in the taxable year of the
theft. Any recovery required to be included in Indiana
adjusted gross income as a result of this section shall not be an
addback for purposes of section 2.5 or 2.6 of this chapter.
(i) If a taxpayer claims a deduction under this section for a
taxable year beginning before January 1, 2026, the taxpayer claims
a refund as a result of the deduction, and interest is due on the
refund under IC 6-8.1-9-2(d), then the amount of interest due on
the refund shall be computed from the latest of:
(1) April 15, 2026;
(2) the date the department issues the determination under
subsection (g); or
(3) the date determined under IC 6-8.1-9-2(d).
SECTION 23. IC 6-3.1-41 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]:
Chapter 41. Small Business Tax Credit for Employee Child
Care Costs
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "contribution" means an amount
of money equal to or exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
during the calendar year that is provided by a taxpayer to a
qualified employee for use toward the qualified employee's cost for
child care.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "employer" has the meaning set
forth in Section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "pass through entity" means a:
(1) corporation that is exempt from the adjusted gross income
tax under IC 6-3-2-2.8(2);
(2) partnership;
(3) trust;
(4) limited liability company; or
(5) limited liability partnership.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "qualified employee" means an
individual who:
(1) is employed for consideration or who renders any other
standard of service generally accepted by custom or specified
by contract as employment; and
(2) has a child who:
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(A) resides with the individual; and
(B) is not eligible:
(i) for payment for child care through the federal Child
Care and Development Fund voucher program
administered under 45 CFR 98 and 45 CFR 99; or
(ii) to receive a grant under the prekindergarten
program established under IC 12-17.2-7.2.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "state tax liability" means a
taxpayer's total tax liability that is incurred under:
(1) IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7 (the adjusted gross income tax);
(2) IC 6-5.5 (the financial institutions tax); and
(3) IC 27-1-18-2 (the insurance premiums tax);
as computed after the application of the credits that under
IC 6-3.1-1-2 are to be applied before the credit provided by this
chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "taxpayer" means a person,
corporation, partnership, or other entity that:
(1) has any state tax liability;
(2) is the employer of a qualified employee; and
(3) has the equivalent of twenty-five (25) or fewer employees.
Sec. 7. A taxpayer that makes a contribution to a qualified
employee for the qualified employee's cost for child care during a
taxable year is entitled to a credit against the taxpayer's state tax
liability in the taxable year in which the taxpayer makes the
contribution. The amount of a taxpayer's credit is equal to the
lesser of:
(1) five thousand dollars ($5,000); or
(2) the taxpayer's adjusted gross income tax liability.
Sec. 8. To apply a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability,
a taxpayer must claim the credit on the taxpayer's annual state tax
return or returns in the manner prescribed by the department. The
taxpayer shall submit to the department the information that the
department determines is necessary for the department to
determine whether the taxpayer is eligible for the credit.
Sec. 9. A taxpayer that makes a contribution to a qualified
employee is considered to have made the contribution on the date
that:
(1) the taxpayer's contribution is postmarked or accepted by
a delivery service, for contributions that are provided to a
qualified employee by mail or delivery service; or
(2) the taxpayer's electronic funds transfer is initiated, for
contributions that are provided to a qualified employee by
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


electronic funds transfer.
Sec. 10. A taxpayer is not entitled to a carryback, carryover, or
refund of an unused credit.
Sec. 11. A taxpayer may not sell, assign, convey, or otherwise
transfer the tax credit provided by this chapter.
Sec. 12. If a pass through entity is entitled to a credit under
section 7 of this chapter but does not have state tax liability against
which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder, partner, or
member of the pass through entity is entitled to a tax credit equal
to:
(1) the tax credit determined for the pass through entity for
the taxable year; multiplied by
(2) the percentage of the pass through entity's distributive
income to which the shareholder, partner, or member is
entitled.
Sec. 13. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 24. IC 6-3.1-47 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 47. Income Tax Credit for First Time Home Buyers
with a Mortgage
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "eligible home buyer" means an
individual who:
(1) is a mortgagor of a first time home buyer mortgage for a
homestead;
(2) takes possession of and uses the homestead for which the
individual has a first time home buyer mortgage as the
individual's principal place of residence; and
(3) has an annual income that is at or below two hundred
percent (200%) of the federal poverty income level for the
taxable year.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "first time home buyer
mortgage" means a mortgage of an individual purchasing a
residence in Indiana who is a first time home buyer or has not
owned a home in the last three (3) years.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "homestead" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-1.1-12-37.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "state income tax liability"
means an individual's adjusted gross income tax liability under
IC 6-3.
Sec. 5. (a) An eligible home buyer with a first time home buyer
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


mortgage is entitled to a credit against the individual's state income
tax liability.
(b) The amount of the credit is equal to three thousand dollars
($3,000) for the taxable year. The amount of any unused credit
under this section for a taxable year may not be carried forward to
a succeeding taxable year, carried back to a preceding taxable
year, or refunded.
(c) An eligible home buyer is entitled to claim the credit amount
under subsection (b) only for the first taxable year in which the
home buyer first takes ownership of the homestead with respect to
which a first time home buyer mortgage is granted. In the case of
a husband and wife who file a joint return, the husband and wife
may claim the whole credit on their return, and if those taxpayers
file separate tax returns, the husband and wife may claim the
credit in equal shares or one (1) spouse may claim the whole credit.
Sec. 6. An individual claiming a credit under this chapter shall
submit to the department all information that the department
determines is necessary for the determination of the credit
provided by this chapter.
SECTION 25. IC 6-3.1-48 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 48. Income Tax Credit for Low Income Households
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Eligible household" means a household in which the
household's income is at or below two hundred percent
(200%) of the federal poverty guidelines for a household of
that size.
(2) "Household" means any individual or group of individuals
who are living together at the same address as one (1)
economic unit. A household may include related and
unrelated persons. Children less than eighteen (18) years of
age living with their parents or guardians are considered to be
part of the same household as their parents or guardians.
(3) "Household income" means the adjusted gross income for
all members of the household.
(4) "Taxpayer" means an individual who files an adjusted
gross income tax return.
Sec. 2. Subject to section 3 of this chapter, each taxable year a
taxpayer who is a member of an eligible household is entitled to a
credit against the taxpayer's adjusted gross income tax liability
equal to three thousand dollars ($3,000). The amount of any
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


unused credit under this section for a taxable year may not be
carried forward to a succeeding taxable year, carried back to a
preceding taxable year, or refunded.
Sec. 3. (a) Only one (1) member of an eligible household may
claim a tax credit under section 2 of this chapter in a taxable year.
In the case of a husband and wife who are both members of the
same eligible household and who file a joint return, the husband
and wife may claim the whole credit on their return, and if those
taxpayers file separate tax returns, the husband and wife may
claim the credit in equal shares or one (1) spouse may claim the
whole credit.
(b) A taxpayer must claim the tax credit provided by this
chapter in the manner prescribed by the department and submit
all information that the department determines is necessary for the
determination of the credit provided by this chapter.
SECTION 26. IC 6-3.6-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to all
counties.
(b) The adopting body may by ordinance and subject to subsections
(c) through (e) and (d) impose one (1) or more of the following
component rates not to exceed a total expenditure tax rate under this
chapter of two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) three and
three-quarters percent (3.75%) on the adjusted gross income of
taxpayers who reside in the county:
(1) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%)
one and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent
(1.625%) for general purpose revenue for county services (as
provided in section 4 of this chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(2) A tax rate not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) for
providers of fire protection and emergency medical services
located within the county (as provided in section 4.3 of this
chapter), subject to subsection (c).
(3) A tax rate not to exceed two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) for
general purpose revenue for distribution to nonmunicipal civil
taxing units (excluding fire protection districts) located within the
county (as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter), subject to
subsection (c).
(4) A tax rate not to exceed one and two-tenths percent (1.2%)
one and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent
(1.625%) for general purpose revenue for municipal services for
distribution to municipalities located within the county that are
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


not eligible to adopt a municipal tax rate under section 22 of this
chapter or that have made an election under section 23(b)(3) of
this chapter to be treated as such.
(c) The combined component rates imposed by an adopting body
under subsection (b)(1) through (b)(3) shall not exceed one and
seven-tenths percent (1.7%). two and one hundred twenty-five
thousandths percent (2.125%).
(d) A tax rate adopted under subsection (b)(4) may only be imposed
on taxpayers who do not reside in a municipality that is eligible to
adopt a municipal tax rate under section 22 of this chapter.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, a tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire on December 31 of each calendar year. An
adopting body wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in
the succeeding year must pass an ordinance to readopt a tax rate in
accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3. This subsection applies regardless of
whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the component rates
or the rates are unchanged from the previous year.
SECTION 27. IC 6-3.6-6-4.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 127, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.3. (a) Revenue raised from a tax
rate for fire protection and emergency medical services under section
2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be distributed by the county to:
(1) each fire protection district, fire protection territory, and
municipal fire department located within the county; and
(2) in the case of a consolidated county, the fire special service
district established under IC 36-3-1-6.
At the discretion of the county council, the county may distribute
revenue raised from a tax rate for fire protection and emergency
medical services under section 2(b)(2) of this chapter to township fire
departments and volunteer fire departments.
(b) Revenue raised from a tax rate for fire protection and emergency
medical services under section 2(b)(2) of this chapter shall be allocated
to each fire protection district, fire protection territory, municipal fire
department, and, if applicable, township fire departments and volunteer
fire departments, based on the following formula:
STEP ONE: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the population
living within the service boundaries of the provider using the
most recent federal decennial census.
STEP TWO: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


receive revenue under this section, determine the number of
square miles within the service boundaries of the provider.
STEP THREE: For each provider of fire protection and
emergency medical services located within the county that is
eligible to receive revenue under this section, determine the
product of:
(A) the STEP TWO amount; multiplied by
(B) twenty (20).
STEP FOUR: For each provider of fire protection and emergency
medical services located within the county that is eligible to
receive revenue under this section, determine the sum of:
(A) the STEP ONE result; plus
(B) the STEP THREE result.
STEP FIVE: Determine the sum total of the STEP FOUR results
for each provider of fire protection and emergency medical
services located within the county that is eligible to receive
revenue under this section.
STEP SIX: The percentage of revenue that shall be distributed to
each provider of fire protection and emergency medical services
located within the county that is eligible to receive revenue under
this section is equal to:
(A) the STEP FOUR result for the provider; divided by
(B) the STEP FIVE result.
SECTION 28. IC 6-3.6-6-4.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter
may be distributed by the county to nonmunicipal civil taxing units
subject to the provisions of this section.
(b) Subject to the maximum aggregate tax rate of not more than
two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter,
the adopting body may adopt a tax rate for each type of nonmunicipal
civil taxing unit, which may not exceed more than five-hundredths of
one percent (0.05%) for any given unit type. The revenue raised from
a tax rate for a specific type of nonmunicipal civil taxing unit shall be
allocated to all nonmunicipal civil taxing units of that same type
located within the county on a pro rata per capita basis, subject to
subsection (e).
(c) A county solid waste management district (as defined in
IC 13-11-2-47) or a joint solid waste management district (as defined
in IC 13-11-2-113) is not an eligible nonmunicipal civil taxing unit for
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


the purpose of receiving an allocation of general purpose revenue under
this chapter unless a majority of the members of each of the county
fiscal bodies of the counties within the district passes a resolution
approving the distribution.
(d) A resolution passed by a county fiscal body under subsection (c)
may:
(1) expire on a date specified in the resolution; or
(2) remain in effect until the county fiscal body revokes or
rescinds the resolution.
(e) Subject to subsection (h), a nonmunicipal civil taxing unit
wishing to receive a share of revenue under this section in a year must
adopt a resolution requesting the distribution from the county and must
provide a certified copy of the resolution to the adopting body not later
than July 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution year. Not
later than August 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution
year, the adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the resolution
requesting the distribution and provide the public with notice of the
time and place where the public hearing will be held. The notice must
be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include a description of the
resolution requesting the distribution from the county.
(f) If a nonmunicipal civil taxing unit adopts a resolution under this
subsection subsection (e) and provides the resolution to the adopting
body as set forth in this that subsection or subsection (h), if
applicable, the county shall distribute to the nonmunicipal civil taxing
unit an amount of revenue raised from the tax rate under section
2(b)(3) of this chapter for the distribution year as set forth in subsection
(f). (g).
(g) If one (1) or more, but not all, nonmunicipal civil taxing units
adopt a resolution under subsection (e) requesting a distribution in a
given year, the county may either distribute the total amount of revenue
raised from the tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to only
those nonmunicipal civil taxing units that have provided a resolution
request, or the county may distribute the total amount of revenue raised
from a tax rate under section 2(b)(3) of this chapter to all nonmunicipal
civil taxing units as set forth in this section. If no nonmunicipal civil
taxing units adopt a resolution to request a distribution in a given year,
the county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate for
nonmunicipal civil taxing units for that year and use the revenue as
general purpose revenue for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
(h) This subsection applies only for a distribution under this
section by the county to nonmunicipal civil taxing units in 2028. A
nonmunicipal civil taxing unit wishing to receive a share of revenue
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


under this section in 2028 must adopt a resolution requesting the
distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of
the resolution to the adopting body not later than December 31,
2027. The adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the
resolution requesting the distribution and provide the public with
notice of the time and place where the public hearing will be held.
The notice must be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include
a description of the resolution requesting the distribution from the
county.
SECTION 29. IC 6-3.6-6-6.1, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6.1. (a) Revenue raised from a tax rate for certain
cities and towns under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter may be
distributed by the county to those cities and towns subject to the
provisions of this section.
(b) Subject to subsection (g), (h), the revenue raised from a tax rate
under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be allocated to the cities and
towns based on the population of the city or the population of the town,
whichever is applicable, compared to the population of all the cities or
the population of all the towns, whichever is applicable, that are
eligible for a distribution, subject to subsection (d). For purposes of this
determination, if the boundaries of a city or town are located in more
than one (1) county, only the portion of the population of the city or
town that is located within the county imposing the tax rate under
section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be considered.
(c) The money may be used by the city or town fiscal body for any
of the purposes of the city or town, including public safety (as defined
in IC 6-3.6-2-14) and economic development purposes described in
IC 6-3.6-10. The city or town fiscal body may pledge its general
purpose revenue to the payment of bonds or to lease payments as set
forth in this chapter.
(d) Subject to subsection (g), an eligible city or town wishing to
receive a share of revenue under this section in a year must adopt a
resolution requesting the distribution from the county and must provide
a certified copy of the resolution to the adopting body not later than
July 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution year. Not later
than August 1 of the year immediately preceding the distribution year,
the adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the resolution
requesting the distribution and provide the public with notice of the
time and place where the public hearing will be held. The notice must
be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include a description of the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


resolution requesting the distribution from the county.
(e) Subject to subsection (g), subsections (g) and (h), if an eligible
city or town adopts a resolution under this subsection subsection (d)
and provides the resolution to the adopting body as set forth in this that
subsection or subsection (g), if applicable, the county shall distribute
to the eligible city or town unit an amount of revenue raised from the
tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter for the distribution year as
set forth in subsection (f).
(f) Subject to subsection (g), (h), if one (1) or more, but not all,
eligible cities or towns adopt a resolution under subsection (d)
requesting a distribution in a given year, the county may either
distribute the total amount of revenue raised from the tax rate under
section 2(b)(4) of this chapter to only those eligible cities or towns that
have provided a resolution request, or the county may distribute the
total amount of revenue raised from a tax rate under section 2(b)(4) of
this chapter to all eligible cities or towns as set forth in this section. If
no eligible city or town adopts a resolution to request a distribution in
a given year, the county may retain the revenue raised from a tax rate
for the eligible city or town for that year and use the revenue as general
purpose revenue for the county under section 4 of this chapter.
(g) This subsection applies only for a distribution under this
section by the county to eligible cities and towns in 2028. An
eligible city or town wishing to receive a share of revenue under
this section in 2028 must adopt a resolution requesting the
distribution from the county and must provide a certified copy of
the resolution to the adopting body not later than December 31,
2027. The adopting body shall hold a public hearing on the
resolution requesting the distribution and provide the public with
notice of the time and place where the public hearing will be held.
The notice must be given in accordance with IC 5-3-1 and include
a description of the resolution requesting the distribution from the
county.
(g) (h) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section,
if an adopting body that imposes a tax rate of one and two-tenths
percent (1.2%) under section 2(b)(1) of this chapter subsequently
adopts an ordinance to concurrently impose a tax rate under section
2(b)(4) of this chapter:
(1) seventy-five percent (75%) of the revenue received from the
tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
retained by the county and may be used for the purposes
described in section 4 of this chapter; and
(2) twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenue received from the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


tax rate imposed under section 2(b)(4) of this chapter shall be
distributed among the eligible cities and towns as set forth in this
section and may be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
However, the adopting body may, by ordinance, determine to allocate
any percentage of the revenue that would otherwise be retained by the
county under subdivision (1) to instead be allocated among the eligible
cities and towns under subdivision (2).
SECTION 30. IC 6-3.6-6-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 147, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. (a) As used in this section,
"municipality" means only a city or town that:
(1) has a population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or
more; and
(2) in the case of a city or town whose population decreased in the
most recent federal decennial census from three thousand five
hundred (3,500) or more to less than three thousand five hundred
(3,500), has elected by ordinance to continue to use its previous
population of three thousand five hundred (3,500) or more as set
forth in section 23(b)(2) of this chapter for purposes of the
allocation determination under section 6.1 of this chapter.
The term does not include a city or town that has made an election
under section 23(b)(3) of this chapter. In addition, in the case of a
consolidated city, an included town that is part of the consolidated
city under IC 36-3-1 is not a separate municipality for purposes of
this chapter.
(b) Beginning after December 31, 2027, the fiscal body of a
municipality may by ordinance and subject to subsection (e), impose
a local income tax rate on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers
in the municipality that does not exceed one and two-tenths percent
(1.2%). one and six hundred twenty-five thousandths percent
(1.625%).
(c) The following apply if a municipality imposes a local income tax
rate under this section:
(1) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality under this
section applies only to local taxpayers within the territory of the
municipality.
(2) The local income tax is imposed in addition to a tax imposed
by the county in which the municipality is located in accordance
with IC 6-3.6-4-1(a) and IC 6-3.6-4-1(c).
(3) The following provisions of this article apply to a local income
tax rate imposed by a municipality under subsection (b):
(A) IC 6-3.6-3 (adoption of the tax), including the effective
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


date of an ordinance under IC 6-3.6-3-3.3.
(B) IC 6-3.6-4 (imposition of the tax), except that IC 6-3.6-4-2
and IC 6-3.6-4-3 do not apply.
(C) IC 6-3.6-8 (administration of the tax).
(4) A local income tax rate imposed by a municipality shall apply
to professional athletes who compete in the municipality, unless
exempted under IC 6-3-2-27.5 or other provision of law.
(d) The amount of the tax revenue that is from the local income tax
rate imposed under this section and that is collected for a calendar year
shall be treated as general purpose revenue and must be distributed to
the fiscal officer of the municipality that imposed the tax before July 1
of the next calendar year.
(e) Beginning after December 31, 2030, a tax rate imposed under
subsection (b) shall expire on December 31 of each calendar year. A
municipality wishing to continue, increase, or decrease a tax rate in the
succeeding year must pass an ordinance to readopt a tax rate in
accordance with IC 6-3.6-3-3.3. This subsection applies regardless of
whether there is a modification in the tax rate or the rate is unchanged
from the previous year.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the fiscal body
of a municipality may adopt an ordinance after June 30, 2027, and
before October 1, 2027, to impose a local income tax rate under
this section as set forth in subsection (b).
SECTION 31. IC 6-3.6-6-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 148, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 23. (a) This section applies in
determining the population of a city or town for the purposes of this
chapter.
(b) The following apply:
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3), the population
of a city or town is the population of the city or town that is
reported by the 2020 federal decennial census or, if applicable,
any federal special census (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-2) issued
for the city or town in the year succeeding the federal
decennial census.
(2) Beginning after 2030, if the population of a city or town:
(A) increases from a population of less than three thousand
five hundred (3,500), as reported by the immediately
preceding federal decennial census, to a population of three
thousand five hundred (3,500) or more, as reported by the
most recent federal decennial census, or, if applicable, any
corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
recent federal decennial census; or
(B) decreases from a population of three thousand five
hundred (3,500) or more, as reported by the immediately
preceding federal decennial census, to a population of less
than three thousand five hundred (3,500), as reported by the
most recent federal decennial census, or, if applicable, any
corrected population count (as defined in IC 1-1-3.5-1.5)
issued for the city or town in the year succeeding the most
recent federal decennial census;
the fiscal body of the city or town may adopt an ordinance on or
before September 1 of the calendar year immediately succeeding
the most recent federal decennial census to continue to use the
population of the city or town as reported by the immediately
preceding federal decennial census and the resulting
determination for the city or town under section 22 of this chapter,
notwithstanding the increase or decrease in its population as
reported by the most recent federal decennial census as described
in this subdivision. An ordinance adopted under this subdivision
shall take effect on January 1 of the calendar year that
immediately succeeds the year in which the ordinance is adopted.
The fiscal officer of the city or town shall provide a certified copy
of an ordinance adopted under this subdivision to the department
of local government finance.
(3) This subdivision applies only to cities and towns with a
population of more than three thousand five hundred (3,500) two
thousand (2,000) but less than seven thousand (7,000).
thirty-four thousand (34,000). Notwithstanding any other
provision, a fiscal body of a city or town may adopt an ordinance
to elect to be treated as if the city's or town's population is less
than three thousand five hundred (3,500) for purposes of a county
local income tax rate and distribution under this chapter. An
ordinance adopted under this subdivision shall take effect on
January 1 of the calendar year that immediately succeeds the year
in which the ordinance is adopted. The fiscal officer of the city or
town shall provide a certified copy of an ordinance adopted under
this subdivision to the department of local government finance.
An ordinance adopted by a city or town under this subdivision is
not revocable and shall not expire following the next federal
decennial census.
SECTION 32. IC 6-3.6-7-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2016,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies only to an
eligible county, as defined in IC 8-25-1-4.
(b) If the voters of the county approve a local public question under
IC 8-25-2, the fiscal body of the county may adopt an ordinance to
provide for the use of local income tax revenues attributable to an
additional tax rate imposed under IC 6-3.6-6 to fund a public
transportation project under IC 8-25. However, a county fiscal body
shall adopt an ordinance under this subsection if required by
IC 8-25-6-10 to impose an additional tax rate on the county taxpayers
(as defined in IC 8-24-1-10) who reside in a township in which the
voters approve a public transportation project in a local public question
held under IC 8-25-6. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must
specify an additional tax rate to be imposed in the county (or township
in the case of an additional rate required by IC 8-25-6-10) of at least
one-tenth percent (0.1%), but not more than twenty-five hundredths
percent (0.25%). If an ordinance is adopted under this subsection, the
amount of the certified distribution attributable to the additional tax
rate imposed under this subsection must be:
(1) retained by the county auditor;
(2) deposited in the county public transportation project fund
established under IC 8-25-3-7; and
(3) used for the purpose provided in this subsection instead of as
a property tax replacement distribution.
(c) The tax rate under this section plus the tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6
may not exceed the tax rate specified in IC 6-3.6-6-2.
SECTION 33. IC 6-3.6-9-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 156, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) Revenue derived from the
imposition of the tax shall, in the manner prescribed by this chapter, be
distributed to the county adopting body that imposed it. The amount
that is to be distributed to a county an adopting body during an
ensuing calendar year equals the amount of tax revenue that the budget
agency determines has been:
(1) attributed to that county adopting body for a taxable year
ending in a calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the
determination is made; and
(2) reported on an annual return or amended return filed by or for
a county an adopting body taxpayer and processed by the
department in the state fiscal year ending before July 1, or for a
federal income tax deadline set after July 1, a date set by the
department for a period of not more than sixty (60) days beyond
the federal deadline, of the calendar year in which the
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


determination is made;
(b) The distribution under subsection (a) shall be adjusted
without adjustment based on the enactment of a tax rate change under
IC 6-3.6-6-2 or IC 6-3.6-6-22 in the first preceding calendar year it
becomes effective.
(c) Before December 31, 2027, the budget agency shall make a
special distribution from the trust account maintained for the
county under section 1 of this chapter (before its expiration on
December 31, 2027). The budget agency shall determine the greater
of zero (0) or the result of the difference between:
(1) the county's trust account balance as of December 31,
2026; minus
(2) the county's certified distribution amount for 2028;
and distribute to each county a special distribution equal to eighty
percent (80%) of the amount determined for the county.
SECTION 34. IC 6-3.6-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) Before October 1 of each
calendar year, the budget agency shall certify to the department of local
government finance and the county auditor of each adopting county
body the amount determined under sections 4 and 4.1 of this chapter.
The amount certified is the county's adopting body's certified
distribution for the immediately succeeding calendar year. The amount
certified shall be adjusted, as necessary, under sections 6 and 7 of this
chapter. Subject to subsection (b), not later than thirty (30) days after
receiving the amount of the certified distribution, the department of
local government finance shall determine for each taxing unit and
notify the county auditor of the certified amount that will be distributed
to the taxing unit under this chapter during the ensuing calendar year.
Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the department's estimate,
the county auditor shall notify each taxing unit of the certified amounts
for the taxing unit.
(b) This subsection applies to Lake County. When the department
of local government finance notifies the county auditor of the certified
amount that will be distributed to the taxing unit under this chapter
during the ensuing calendar year, the department of local government
finance shall also determine the amount of general purpose revenue
allocated for economic development purposes that will be distributed
to each civil taxing unit, reduced by an amount that is equal to the
following percentages of the tax revenue that would otherwise be
allocated for economic development purposes and distributed to the
civil taxing unit:
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


(1) For Lake County, an amount equal to twenty-five percent
(25%).
(2) For Crown Point, an amount equal to ten percent (10%).
(3) For Dyer, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(4) For Gary, an amount equal to seven and five-tenths percent
(7.5%).
(5) For Hammond, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(6) For Highland, an amount equal to twelve percent (12%).
(7) For Hobart, an amount equal to eighteen percent (18%).
(8) For Lake Station, an amount equal to twenty percent (20%).
(9) For Lowell, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
(10) For Merrillville, an amount equal to twenty-two percent
(22%).
(11) For Munster, an amount equal to thirty-four percent (34%).
(12) For New Chicago, an amount equal to one percent (1%).
(13) For Schererville, an amount equal to ten percent (10%).
(14) For Schneider, an amount equal to twenty percent (20%).
(15) For Whiting, an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%).
(16) For Winfield, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%).
The department of local government finance shall notify the county
auditor of the remaining amounts to be distributed and the amounts of
the reductions that will be withheld under IC 6-3.6-11-5.5.
SECTION 35. IC 6-3.6-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 160, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. The budget agency shall adjust
the certified distribution of a county an adopting body to correct for
any clerical or mathematical errors made in any previous certification
under this section. The budget agency may reduce the amount of the
certified distribution over several calendar years so that any adjustment
under this subsection is offset over several years rather than in one (1)
lump sum.
(b) The budget agency may not reduce, adjust, or modify a certified
distribution of a county an adopting body after it has been presented
as part of the report to the budget committee for the immediately
succeeding calendar year under section 21 of this chapter, except in the
case of clerical and mathematical errors.
SECTION 36. IC 6-3.6-9-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 166, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. One-twelfth (1/12) of each
adopting county's body's certified distribution for a calendar year shall
be distributed:
(1) before January 1, 2028, from its trust account established
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


under this chapter; and
(2) after December 31, 2027, from the state and local income tax
holding account established under this chapter;
to the appropriate county treasurer fiscal officer on the first regular
business day of each month of that calendar year.
SECTION 37. IC 6-3.6-9-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 170, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16. Upon receipt, each monthly
payment of a county's an adopting body's certified distribution shall
be allocated and distributed to the appropriate entities in accordance
with this article and the allocation ordinances adopted under this
article.
SECTION 38. IC 6-3.6-9-17.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 17.5. After December 31, 2027, the
county's an adopting body's certified distribution amount for 2028
shall be maintained in the accounting for the county adopting body
under section 21 of this chapter and transferred as set forth in section
21 of this chapter.
SECTION 39. IC 6-3.6-9-20, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 172, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20. (a) The state and local income
tax holding account is established within the state general fund for the
purposes of this chapter. The local income tax holding account shall
include a subaccount for each county that imposes a tax rate under
IC 6-3.6-6-2 and municipality that imposes a tax rate under
IC 6-3.6-6-22. The budget agency shall administer the account. The
account consists of the following:
(1) Money transferred to the account under section 21 of this
chapter.
(2) Money transferred to the account from any other source.
(3) Interest that accrues from money in the account.
(b) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed for the purposes of the account in the same manner as
other public funds may be invested.
(c) Money in the account is continuously appropriated for the
purposes of this chapter.
(d) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(e) Money transferred to the account shall be distributed and
allocated as set forth in this chapter.
(f) The budget director shall have the discretion to manage transfers
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


of money into and out of the account based on the current process used
for continuous assessment of revenue flows and reconciliation based
on the latest data.
SECTION 40. IC 6-3.6-9-21, AS ADDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 173, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 21. (a) The budget agency shall
maintain an accounting for each county and municipality imposing a
tax based on annual returns filed by or for county or municipality
taxpayers, as applicable. Beginning after December 31, 2027, any
undistributed amounts so accounted shall be held for purposes of the
state and local income tax holding account, in each respective
subaccount of an adopting body.
(b) After December 1 but before December 31 of each year, the
budget agency shall present to the budget committee a report of the
following:
(1) An estimate of the monthly certified distribution amounts for
the immediately succeeding calendar year.
(2) A description of the method used to determine the monthly
estimates under subdivision (1).
(c) Beginning in 2028, and in each calendar year thereafter, the
budget agency shall each month transfer to the state and local income
tax holding account the amount determined for the month under
subsection (b)(1) for distribution under this chapter.
(d) In the case of a county that imposes a tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6-2
or a municipality that imposes a tax rate under IC 6-3.6-6-22 beginning
after December 31, 2027, the budget agency shall withhold, from each
of the first three (3) annual certified distributions resulting from the tax
rate, an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the county's or
municipality's, as applicable, annual certified distribution resulting
from the tax rate. The amounts withheld under this subsection shall be
credited to the respective county's or municipality's trust account.
SECTION 41. IC 6-3.6-11-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]. Sec. 5. (a) This section applies to Marion
County's allocation of the tax revenue under IC 6-3.6-6 that is
dedicated to certified shares.
(b) The consolidated city, the county, all special taxing districts,
special service districts, included towns (as defined in IC 36-3-1-7),
and all other political subdivisions except:
(1) townships;
(2) excluded cities (as defined in IC 36-3-1-7); and
(3) school corporations;
are considered to comprise one (1) civil taxing unit whose fiscal body
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


is the fiscal body of the consolidated city.
(c) For purposes of subsection (d), the following amounts are
referred to as the subsection (c) ratio:
Center Township .0251
Decatur Township .00217
Franklin Township .0023
Lawrence Township .01177
Perry Township .01130
Pike Township .01865
Warren Township .01359
Washington Township .01346
Wayne Township .01307
Lawrence-City .00858
Beech Grove .00845
Southport .00025
Speedway .00722
Indianapolis/Marion County .86409
(d) The distributive shares that each civil taxing unit in the county
is entitled to receive during a month equals the total amount of
revenues that are to be distributed as distributive shares during that
month calculated as follows:
STEP ONE: Determine the total amount of revenues that were
distributed as distributive shares during that month in calendar
year 1995.
STEP TWO: Determine the total amount of revenue that the
department has certified as distributive shares for that month
under IC 6-3.6-6 for the calendar year.
STEP THREE: Subtract the STEP ONE result from the STEP
TWO result.
STEP FOUR: If the STEP THREE result is less than or equal
to zero (0), multiply the STEP TWO result by the applicable
subsection (c) ratio for the civil taxing unit.
STEP FIVE: Determine the ratio of:
(A) the maximum permissible property tax levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 for each civil taxing unit for the calendar year
in which the month falls, plus, for a county, the welfare
allocation amount; divided by
(B) the sum of the maximum permissible property tax levies
under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for all civil taxing units of the county
during the calendar year in which the month falls, and an
amount equal to the welfare allocation amount.
STEP SIX: If the STEP THREE result is greater than zero (0),
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


the STEP ONE amount shall be distributed by multiplying the
STEP ONE amount by the subsection (c) ratio.
STEP SEVEN: For each taxing unit determine the STEP FIVE
ratio multiplied by the STEP TWO amount.
STEP EIGHT: For each civil taxing unit determine the
difference between the STEP SEVEN amount minus the
product of the STEP ONE amount multiplied by the subsection
(c) ratio. The STEP THREE excess shall be distributed as
provided in STEP NINE only to the civil taxing units that have
a STEP EIGHT difference greater than or equal to zero (0).
STEP NINE: For the civil taxing units qualifying for a
distribution under STEP EIGHT, each civil taxing unit's share
equals the STEP THREE excess multiplied by the ratio of:
(A) the maximum permissible property tax levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 for the qualifying civil taxing unit during the
calendar year in which the month falls, plus, for a county, an
amount equal to the welfare allocation amount; divided by
(B) the sum of the maximum permissible property tax levies
under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for all qualifying civil taxing units of
the county during the calendar year in which the month falls,
and an amount equal to the welfare allocation amount.
SECTION 42. IC 20-46-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 224, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 3. (a) This
section applies to property tax levies imposed before January 1, 2026.
(b) (a) Subject to subsection (c), (b), a school corporation may
appeal to the department of local government finance under
IC 6-1.1-19 to increase the school corporation's maximum permissible
operations fund levy. The appeal must be filed with the department of
local government finance before October 20 of the year before the
increase is proposed to take effect. To be granted an increase by the
department of local government finance, the school corporation must
establish that the increase is necessary because of either or both of the
following:
(1) A cost increase of at least ten percent (10%) over the
preceding year for at least one (1) of the following:
(A) A fuel expense increase.
(B) A cost increase due to an increase in the number of
students enrolled in the school corporation who need
transportation or an increase in the mileage traveled by the
school corporation's buses compared with the previous year.
(C) A cost increase due to an increase in the number of
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


students enrolled in special education who need transportation
or an increase in the mileage traveled by the school
corporation's buses due to students enrolled in special
education as compared with the previous year.
(D) Increased transportation operating costs due to compliance
with a court ordered desegregation plan.
(E) A cost increase due to the closure of a school building
within the school corporation that results in a significant
increase in the distances that students must be transported to
attend another school building.
(F) A cost increase due to restructuring or redesigning
transportation services due to a need for additional, expanded,
consolidated, or modified routes.
(G) A labor cost increase due to a labor shortage affecting the
school corporation's ability to hire qualified transportation
employees.
To obtain the increase, the school corporation must establish that
it will be unable to provide transportation services without an
increase.
(2) A cost increase associated with the school corporation's bus
replacement plan adopted or amended under IC 20-40-18-9 (after
December 31, 2018). To obtain the increase, the school
corporation must show that the school corporation must incur
reasonable and necessary expenses to acquire additional buses
under the plan.
The department of local government finance may grant a levy increase
that is less than the increase requested by the school corporation. If the
department of local government finance determines that a permanent
increase in the maximum permissible levy is necessary, the increase
granted under this section shall be added to the school corporation's
maximum permissible operations fund levy as provided in section 1 of
this chapter.
(c) (b) This subsection applies to a school corporation whose budget
for the upcoming year is subject to review by a fiscal body under
IC 6-1.1-17-20. A school corporation described in this subsection may
not submit an appeal under this section unless the school corporation
receives approval from the fiscal body to submit the appeal.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 43. IC 36-1-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. (Debt Limitation).
SECTION 44. IC 36-3-8-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.52-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120


JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 6. Notwithstanding IC 6-3.6-11-5, The
department of local government finance shall adjust the distributive
shares of the consolidated city and county and the town under
IC 6-3.6-11-5 as necessary to account for the town becoming an
excluded city.
SECTION 45. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare, as directed by the legislative council,
legislation for introduction in the 2027 regular session of the
general assembly to correct cross-references and make other
changes to the Indiana Code, as necessary, relating to the repeal of
IC 36-1-15.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 46. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 81—LS 6420/DI 120